As you can see on the pictures I made a mistake. You can still see some of the bases, so I need to fix that a little bit. The sides of the bases are painted green as I will do for all the Napoleonic figures I will paint of that period. I've also painted four more figures.
Rewards:
This story is a wonderful reminder to focus on what is most important in our lives
Dahlia Scheindlin and Larry Derfner – +972 – A lively crowd of approximately 1000 people, according to estimates by the Israeli media, gathered at Habima Square in Tel Aviv to voice its opposition to a war between Israel and Iran. Although hoping to capitalize on the energy of a surprisingly successful grassroots internet campaign that seemed to sweep the whole country last week, the protesters had all the hallmark attributes of a left-wing demonstration: large red flags associated with Hadash, the far-left Jewish-Arab party, calls for the Netanyahu government to resign, and no Israeli flags: here.
1/2 cup roasted almonds coarsely chopped
One day last week, I had a super super busy day ahead of me with errands, work, chores etc. So the first thing I did after getting dressed as go into my craft room and stamp this verse from Wild Flowers in Memento Tuxedo Black on my hand (so it lasted through several washings!), a constant comfort and reminder I'd have with me if things were getting tense! All I had to do was peek down, take a deep breath, and resume! I just loved having that to glance at or meditate on all day. (Tempting to ink it permanently but I am tattoo-free and plan to stay that way! Who needs a tattoo when you have stamps and washable ink?) ;)
“No, I haven’t.” The Doctor frowned, she looks over at JaeChun.
your life that you do repeatedly even though you know it does not feel right?Vulnerability
"Re: Reagan's speechwriters"
It’s been a great year on the veg plot with plenty of successes and a few failures thrown in. More about the highs and lows of 2011 next time. Hope you’re all having a good weekend.
We drove up a spectacular mountain road, and enjoyed the amazing views and seeing lots of Spring flowers. But when we pulled into the parking area at the start of the walk we were in for a bit of a surprise.
Following a newspaper photograph of an open toilet in January 2010, Mayor Dan Plato immediately ordered them to be covered, despite the objections of the 1,261 families who had enclosed their own toilets. But on January 25th, when the City arrived to enclose the toilets, they were prevented from doing so by a small group of people claiming to represent "the community". Two subsequent attempts by the City to erect enclosures, were thwarted when the ANCYL tore them down, despite almost all the individual families requesting, in writing, that the City enclose their toilets.
That in life I’ve faced,
I've made another calendar page...going great guns with this project so let's hope it continues right through the year!!
Then Claire,
Despite the potential danger of being made to feel like I ought to be out exercising or doing yard work or making my kids play in our own yard, I know I won't give up watching. These are risks I am willing to endure in my life as an almost spy.
Well, to be perfectly blunt, I'd rather be doing what I'm doing now. Yes, I make less money. But I get to work semi-normal hours with a semblance of a life away from work. But the real deciding factor is that I like the idea of working to protect the public interest, preventing crappy patents from issuing, rather than to having to try to get some examiner to issue my crappy patent because that's what my client is paying me to do. That's the bottom line.
But she showed them a finger,
"This is yet more proof that independent publishing and print-on-demand is legitimate and successful," says Bob Young, CEO of Lulu.com. "The Internet is truly the great equalizer and gives everyone the chance to publish, especially people such as Diane Klumb, whose award-winning, best-selling book would have never seen the light of day without Lulu."
Today’s card is for Sweet ‘N Sassy Digi Challenge (SNSDC44)! The challenge is a color combination – BLUE, BROWN and YELLOW (other neutral colors for optional).
“And this is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask anything according to his will, he heareth us: And if we know that he hear us, whatsoever we ask, we know that we have the petitions we desired of him” (1 John 5:14-15).
* Human Resources Manager-Recruiter
2. Don't ever feel badly or like you have failed if you have to end your juice feast earlier than you had planned. Listen to YOUR body. Dave
Reader's Feast Bookstore
Salmon with Pineapple and Terriyaki: serves 2
education placed over the news media of what that means, but it will
... but please do
I am drained and becoming ugly again. I am appearing to turn into that desperate person who was raw and primed to have his head fucked with by a married woman. I am desperate but with trust issues.
Jintan: Sure!
I think this might be the first time I have a post that goes in both the "getting greasy" and " foodage" categories.
So, rather than start an argument with inanimate fantasy characters as I have in the past, I think of a topic to blog, spend a few moments and like a jealous dog they start complaining its their turn.
You killed me with all that you were to me,
p.s.: Anybody with a copy of the order is please requested to share the same with us.
Remember this show starring Jason Bateman from the early 1980's? It was hilarious, but I doubt it will ever see the light of day.
I actually made two pages this time. I made this one first but couldn't really decide if I liked it or not,
I seem to have made it through surgery in one piece. At least, I think I am now in one piece, my broken ankle held together by a plate and screws. I can’t really tell because from my angle my leg looks like it belongs on the Michelin Man. I am told I did not need the “long bolt” after all — which I’m not sure but I hope means that one or both of the bolts the doctor had talked about putting across the front (top?) of my foot to anchor the ruptured tendon aren’t there. (I’m having visions of Frankenstein here, with bolts and screws and metal plates.) Anyway, if he didn’t put them in, then he doesn’t have to take them out in 12 weeks like he also talked about, which is good news, because
--Emmie
“Are you with Peak?” he asked.
Last week was a misleading "new episode" of a recap of the past episodes. (also known as completely lame and only serves to annoy already fans rather than gather new fans. one day networks will figure that out...) Yet, I still watched it. All I could think the whole time was look at all her dresses. So I sought out to post my favs. Pictures were harder to find than originally thought, so I didn't get all my favs. Oh well, they're all pretty.
pinch pepper
While it was being built, many New Yorkers were incredulous as to the bridge’s stability, since a structure of that magnitude had not been a part of anyone’s experience. But 127 years later, John Augustus Roebling’s design holds strong and is one of the city’s most iconic and beloved structures, which probably would not have surprised its designer.
The Marshfield Mariner, April 25th, 2012
Playing in support of the album, the band will begin a 22-date tour of North America, beginning with a show in Dallas, Texas on June the 9th.
We have a responsibility to speak the truth. This means, no apocryphal stories!
I reply, you cannot
Texas Gov. Rick Perry’s description of Social Security as a “Ponzi scheme” is drawing lots of criticism from rival candidates Mitt Romney, Michele Bachmann, and Newt Gingrich. But so far at least, it’s not drawing much criticism from the voters most affected by the issue.
In 1747, Sweden decided to locate its main base at Helsinki, a small town of 1500 inhabitants, with the Sveaborg island fortress protecting the waterways. This became the kingdom's largest building project with financial support from France, which had an interest in fortifying Finland against Russia. Sveaborg was built under hard working conditions by Swedish and Finnish soldiers, prisoners and artisans using local materials as well as sandstone and coal imported from Sweden and England.
this long weekend. Now we’re back to normal although Greek Easter is this week and we’re going to celebrate and see our good Greek friends. It’s always fun when we get together.
Another morning rain begins to fall.
Web site: www.Envivio.com
So I spent the day trying out my new punches that I bought from Hanky Panky in America, only to find I had two ivy leaf punches in the same size, not to worry I am sure it can be sorted out.
Amy's Thoughts:
I recommend it for: Those who enjoy family dramas and deep emotional stories, as well as those who are interested in learning about Korean culture.
My thoughts about Nicaragua have a lot to do with observation of others, including my students – several of whom had never left the US before, or flown on a plane. Each time I sit down to write about my experiences in the other Granada, I am waylaid by images from history, presented to me via Susan Meiselas photographs, and a verbal history from my teacher for the week: Maria Lidia. Growing up in the late 1970′s in a family of nine, she saw and heard many things during the revolution. Flipping through the horrific photos, her voice provided the soundtrack to a history I knew nothing about.
Almost as though I am living in a dream or dreaming of the world I am living in.
Easter Egg Hunt at park.
Doctor Visits
The one woman that could throw a monkey wrench into the whole process is Maggie Vessey. Vessey has the talent to run 1:57, but her race tactics too often leave her in poor position to do much damage. If she is near the leaders with 200 to go she could change things dramatically. But my gut says she finishes just outside 2:00 here.
In his guise as a modern artiste Charondrian, in his latest nonsense, reflects on the political creation of modern Africa as seen through the eyes of an erudite elephant.
And then he brought me chocolate cake from The Lucky Dill Bakery
Mata Hari was the stage name Dutch-born Margaretha Zelle took when she became one of Paris’ most popular exotic dancers on the eve of World War I. Although details of her past are sketchy, it is believed that she was born in the Netherlands in 1876 and married a Dutch Army officer 21 years her senior when she was 18. She quickly bore him two children and followed him when he was assigned to Java in 1897. The marriage proved rocky. The couple returned to the Netherlands in 1902 with their daughter (their other child, a son, had died mysteriously in Java). Margaretha’s husband obtained a divorce and retained custody of his daughter.
The Daily Planet – Love
This was embarrassing.
All this, without a shred of evidence that it works.
Also, if you have a project in the running please leave a link to it in the comments so I can help you out also.
(Acts 17:31 (NIV))
Machine Man is a fun satire on our addiction to technology. The characters are all unique and quirky in their own ways, making the plot unpredictable and exciting. I have enjoyed all of Max Barry's books (especially Jennifer Government and Syrup) and I can't wait to read what he writes next.
Beth Jones has been a Prison Educator at Framingham Women’s Prison and an Instructor in The Prison Education Program at Boston University, as well as a Program Director at The Education Initiative at the Mind/Body Medical Institute, Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center and Harvard Medical School. She has written for The New York Times and the Boston Globe, contributed to the collection “Make Mine a Double: Why Women Like Us Like to Drink (Or Not),” UPNE, 2011, and is a co-author of the book “Three Wishes: A True Story of Good Friends, Crushing Heartbreak, and Astonishing Luck on Our Way to Love and Motherhood,” Little, Brown & Co, 2010.
The flavour of figs lends itself perfectly to the middle eastern spices creating a heady perfume with rose water and orange blossom water that transports you to 1001 warm nights in exotic palaces….
The traditional way of serving is by wrapping the glutinous rice together with the sambal in banana leaf. The aroma of the spices in the sambal together with the banana leaf is mouth watering. Hope you will try this dish.
He continues to follow his values and works to educate others, speaking on the importance of values and leadership, lecturing at Harvard, Stanford, Purdue, Berkeley and IMD Business School in Switzerland, among others.
“What shall we do today?” she says,
Beat the egg whites in a mixing bowl until stiff peaks form and fold into the chocolate mixture. Pour into the prepared pan (spray the bottom with nonstick spray) and bake until the cake is set, the top starts to crack, and a toothpick inserted into the cake comes out with moist crumbs clinging to it, 30 to 35 minutes (and then check every five minutes after that--don't overbake). Let stand 10 minutes, then unmold.
- Pasta 200 – 900 g 3 for $8.00 (Catelli)
De-Bittered Black Malt
"Crisis situation" is "crisis"
You have come on vacation to the Cape with us, met our friends in need of homes, been through hurricanes and blizzards.
Just to give you an idea, the following is the breakfast menu.
FINALLY had some success last night with an SCCM job I’ve been trying to run for a week. Task Sequences aren’t like regular assigned programs and the list of ‘gotchas’ is seriously long. Max. Runtimes, maintenance windows, hiding assigned program notifications, all kinds of wacky things. And getting it to run to logged off PCs only. That’s a chore in itself because you can’t assign a task sequence only to logged-off PCs. I don’t think. I’ll look again today. Maybe it’s in the same dialog as the Max. Allowed Runtime. But I don’t think so.
Don't forget to stop by Paperissues.blogspot.com and check
Determining the scope of an examiner’s previous consideration of a reference will generally require an analysis of the record of the prior proceedings to determine if and how the examiner used the reference in making his initial decisions. As we believe that this inquiry is most accurately viewed as a question of fact, we will review the Board’s findings regarding the scope of consideration of a reference during prior examinations for substantial evidence. See also H.R. Rep. No. 107-120, at 3 (stating that there should be "substantial evidence" that the examiner "did not properly understand the reference, or did not consider a portion of the reference in making his decision."). However, the ultimate question of whether the reexamination is based on a substantial new question of patentability, in light of how a reference was previously considered, remains a question of law, which we review de novo. While the standard is more flexible than before, we are mindful that Congress intended that the courts continue to "judiciously interpret the ‘substantial new question’ standard to prevent cases of abusive tactics and harassment of patentees through reexamination." H.R. Rep. No. 107-120, at 3.
Tina Fey
Where truth and beauty dwelt
Traditionally there has been a target market and a designated route for cause marketing. MediaPost’s Perry Allison sums it up well with the phrase Charitable Commerce Consumers http://bit.ly/GIhtVv. A survey shows these are consumers with a median household income of $125,000 a year and median net worth of $375,000. 90% of Charitable Commerce Consumers say they are likely or very likely to shop with a business aligned with a charitable cause. 75% of them have served an active role in a local school, community or national charity and 12% have served on corporate boards. For Charitable Commerce Consumers, supporting businesses that take a serious approach to charities is the norm. Yet, while these consumers have a lot of disposable income and word-of-mouth influence, they don’t represent all of the people out there who donate or would donate to a worthy cause. There are more people to reach and different ways to reach out to them. It’s time for cause marketing to expand its scope and lighten up a little with a dose of humor. David Hessekiel cites Kenneth Cole, Ben & Jerry’s and Chipotle Mexican Grill as examples of companies who raise profits for causes through their humorous and playful takes http://bit.ly/GIhtVv.
“Billy Joel needs to do this song live with this guy behind the piano! Comments, Protecta.
Whether it’s the dramatic setting that appeals, the spotlight or simply from a love literature, this is certainly one performance guests won’t forget in a hurry!
ever-changing and flickering practice by a human group at any very
my foot is on fire and the sanity left us
“We were talking about dreams before, what do you think about dreams?” Naida’s voice pierced the silence like a dagger. It startled him, and his heart felt like it leapt into his throat. He brought a hand to his chest to calm himself, and that was the moment she glanced back at him.
’88 Miyata 1000, Shimano Deore components, stock biopace chainrings on the crank, 3 front (friction) and 6 back (index shift) gears side mounted on downtube, stock cantilever brakes (simple to fix, cheap to replace), cheap SPD Shimano pedals with Look shoes and clips, stock saddle, stock back rack, aftermarket front pannier rack, quick release hubs on stock 36 spoke rims, stock Miyata Radial tires (700C x 32), aftermarket front and back fenders, stock drop bars with foam grips, aftermarket aero bars, bell, front light, and a hub-mounted trailer hitch.
COMA BY PIERRE GUYOTAT
Question: Can someone else actually drop-off my passport for the Visa application on my behalf?
I get butterflies in my stomach when we are together, we are always together.
The US gives billions of dollars in military and humanitarian aid to Pakistan, but has questioned its reliability as an ally in combating the militants.
Material, 100% cotton- (front):
10.5% ABV
Your child gets in to drugs, alcohol and partying, maybe even gets arrested. What do you do? You probably feel like kicking them out of your home, cutting them off financially and pretending they’re not your problem anymore.
It's a beautiful Saturday afternoon here and we actually have had NOTHING to do today besides hang out.. it's been glorious!! We are heading to a friends for dinner and games.... fun!! Enjoy your weekend!
Automatic resizing of images for MMS
My short visit to the U Tomáše Štítného pub was over, but back at the hotel I treated myself to a bottle of 11° Zlatopramen. The golden lager had some carbonation and a large head in the glass. In the nose I felt flowers and grass, and the taste was very alike to the aroma. The finish had a hoppy touch, but there was also a hint of cardboard. Zlatopramen is another great Czech lager, and on my next visit to Prague I will be back at U Tomáše Štítného to try it as a draught beer.
Rhinoplush is the loftiest, most hearty fabric in the line. At its core, Rhinoplush is simply a knitted polyester Velvish bonded to a thick layer of poly-fiber padding. This bonding process creates a sort-of rhinoceros-skin wrinkle which shows through the Velvish. Because this fabric is, in essence, padded Velvish, it has all of the resilience of the impervious, washable, synthetic furniture staple, but with far more loft and resilience. Rhinoplush makes an excellent “family” fabric, as it is stain resistant, easily machine washable, thick, and padded. But the padding adds one more layer of defense for the furniture within: often the padding behind the velvish can act as an absorbent barrier that can protect the furniture beneath. The thickness of the fabric gives it body and loft, making pillows look fluffier, and cushions more crisp, but because it breathes so well, no comfort is sacrificed. Rhinoplush is, well….plush.
Given the amount of carbs I've just ingested, I'm hoping to find a burst of energy towards the end of the day so that I can go for a post work run. Given how I feel right now, however, I'm fairly certain I'm going to need a power nap first; hopefully I'll have the self-discipline to make it a 30 minute quickie, as I believe power naps are supposed to be, rather than taking the word 'power' and using it to mean 'I'm going to pass out, fully dressed, wake up around 8, and then have some wine' which is what I've been known to do on a Friday.
Gunman (Classic) - Funker Vogt
It took me a while to get to the mall because the summer heat was really making me feel lazy and icky, even if I had already taken a bath after waking up soaked in my own sweat. (I think I hate summer, btw) I got there and we had about an hour left before showing, so we had a nice chat to catch up on things. I thought it was funny that he got a new job at the same call center company I was in some couple of years ago, but in a different branch/location and a different account. And I was really happy about it, since he got to treat me because payday was just a couple of days ago, muhahaha.
Tony Mulligan
cumin seeds -2 tsp
However, there comes a point where you have to make money. Period. I am no exception to this rule. I have to take care of my family.
I am not blaming Christianity for Harris’ comments. They are clearly outside the norm. Still, there are a number of Christians who tolerate discrimination against gays, albeit without the violence. “I love the sinner but hate the sin,” they say, and they prove their love of the “sinner” by trying to keep him out of the military, the Boy Scouts, and a wedding tuxedo. I was raised in this tradition, and it wasn’t until high school that I realized how inhumane and cold it is to love the sinner and hate the sin, particularly when homosexuality is the only sin people are actively hating. (Have you ever seen an anti-envy rally? Anti-wrath? Those are deadly sins!)
Domonique
As soon as I saw this week’s theme, I knew which photo I would share. It was taken in the New Forest. I think it speaks for itself. If you get the chance to visit, it will be well worth it – wonderful forest, lots of animals, lovely villages and plenty of walks. One piece of history that might interest folks is the death of William 11, known as William Rufus.
Holtzhausen says his daughter recognised the voice of one of the men as someone who had worked for her and Steyn before.
Primary was busy as usual. We had the Sunbeam A teacher (Andrea), home with Luke (can't take him out for a few days, doctors orders), and we currently don't have a Sunbeam B teacher (she moved last week). Luckily, Laurie was subbing for the A class, and Kayley said that she'd sit with the B class for the first hour. There was few enough kids (usually 8-10 in each class - but only 8 total today) that we could combine A & B together, then just get an extra "body" to "crowd control". It worked nicely.
Brooks® Sports, Inc. is a leading company that manufactures high-quality running shoes and other sports apparel and sports accessories worldwide. Brooks has established their respectable reputation by providing the best quality performance shoes and apparel for sports enthusiasts. Their products have been well-recognized as the best choice for runners of all levels. In fact, they’ve been very popular in providing the best motion control running shoes in the market.
I am the monster reflected in the looking glass
Im tryin to not list this lot and sit pat here on the block..
With Valentine's approaching, I'm wondering if you're a die-hard romantic, or if you prefer eschewing commercially-enforced love days? Bet you can guess what I am, based on how I phrased that!
241. Bread Board @ Teresa’s Next Door (Wayne, PA) 5:35 p.m.
2nd outfit was worn to go to a Christmas Market and to see the Christmas lights switched on in a local town.
Bit late but never mind. So exercise wise I'm playing catch up due to a very busy week. As you know it was buddy's birthday Monday, clearing up and shopping Tuesday, visiting my friend Wednesday, visiting a different friend Thursday and baking a cake for my step-daughter Friday. So I've managed 3 x workouts thus far. Not bad. The Biggest Loser on Thursday and Friday and the Wii dance today.
Something cheerful, something bright.
But truthfully, I don’t think I’ve seen that particular reflection since. As soon as I leave a mirror, the reflection I met leaves, and a new me arrives the next time I face a mirror. I think only see each once, but I can’t be sure. By now we all know that the nature of our situation and talk as though we were buddies even when we haven’t met before. We are, ultimately, the same person, and usually know a great deal about each other. There are small differences, and they make up the bulk of our conversations.
Similar feelings arise when I look through work I’ve dumped. The missteps are a charming dance of their own, and, behind everything I try to explain is someone aspiring to speak truth and put the past to rest.
T.S. Eliot wrote this little ditty in 1922 called The Waste Land. You may recall that it opened with these immortal lines:
2) New York Knicks (18-18) @ Boston Celtics (17-17), Sunday/Noon/ABC
Google posted new aerial photography (or was it satellite imagery this time?) for the Chicago area recently. The images are from March 2012. I don’t think I have ever had the privilege of working with imagery that was captured so close to the date I was actually using it. I remember working on a GIS project where we didn’t get the imagery until a year after the photos were taken. Anyway, I was panning around in Google Earth and noticed a new bike trail in West Chicago. It is a spur off the Great Western Trail near the Prince Crossing Rd parking lot. I like riding in this area because it is where the GWT and the Illinois Prairie Path meet, offering lots of possibilities for a bike ride. The new trail wasn’t in OpenStreetMap yet, so I saw this as a good opportunity to explore a new trail and map it.
First of all, and really, most importantly, Tabbie hasn’t turned up yet. I know you guys have been canvassing Chester in search of her, and I really appreciate your efforts. I guess it’s better to have love and lost than to never have loved at all …
By the time lunch was done, it was overcast and gloomy, threatening to rain. It finally did, around 4pm and I thought, perfect, let me grab a cup of tea and cosy up with a cookbook. Made tea in 5 mins, settled down on the couch with a throw and the rains had disappeared and the sun was out. So I jumped up immediately, frantically arranged my props, prepped up the food and yes, you guessed it right, it started raining. I was so pissed off, I didn't even have the energy to put back all the stuff I had painstakingly arranged (strewn all over the floor would be more precise). I hoped it would be sunny again and it did become bright for a couple of minutes, but by then I was so engrossed in the book, I couldn't care less. It's sad really, because it was a recipe I would have definitely loved to put up here. This morning isn't any better and the weather forecast says, its raining all week. So I guess the recipe is not meant to be displayed as yet..Sigh!
“What is with you? Look, you smell, your table manners are atrocious, and dude you’re a DOG for cryin’ out loud! Now, shoo! Go! Leave me alone!”
But that’s neither nor there, don’t you think?
Enter your email address and you'll be notified when one of our writers adds a new post. We'll also let you know when our literary magazine is open for submissions and when the first edition is coming out.
Autumn is officially here on Wednesday. For some people, the first cool autumn breeze means football season is just around the corner. For others, like me, it means get to the mall ASAP and stock up on chunky sweaters, jewel toned scarves, and a great new pair of jeans. This year, you don’t have to spend your whole paycheck on fall fashion essentials. I’ve found a few tips to help you save money and limit your fashion purchases this fall.
I can see the word cliché flashing in your head as you read the title of this post, but I promise you I have a new thought this time. Just hear me out, it is momentous – me having a new thought, that is! And I promise not to beat around the bush but get to it….soon.
I can play it without looking so I can keep my eyes on the bride. I can play it totally distracted by a reluctant flower girl or a screaming ring bearer (it happens). I can play it as long as I need to for big wedding parties, I can play a shortened version for the bride who wants it for her own processional alone.
I still don’t get why Jesus would zap a fig tree for not having fruit. According to the notes, “Fig trees around Jerusalem normally begin to get leaves in March or April but do not produce figs until their leaves are all out in June. This tree was an exception in that it was already, at Passover time, full of leaves. Perhaps the incident was a parable of judgment, with the fig tree representing Israel. A tree full of leaves normally should have fruit, but this one was cursed because it had none. The fact that the cleansing of the temple is sandwiched between two parts of the account of the fig tree may underscore the theme of judgment.” Ok then. Usually Jesus explains his parables, though, and usually his parables consist of words and not of zapping trees. But I guess that’s as good an explanation as any. Is it ridiculous to feel bad for the tree?
November 3 - Cory Smoot, aka Flattus Maximus, heavy metal guitarist, 34
The war of which Jesus was a casualty was the still unfinished war between the possibility of comprehensive human love and its impossibility. And if you think that this sounds like a war between love and death, you are quite right. The reason why the murder of Jesus was important was not only on account of who he was, but on account of what he meant. He had said that either you chose him or chose death. He meant it, and it was true; and one sprawling human company made its choice, a choice for death, and here we are.
I let go, allowing my true self to show up.
CATCH (Citizens at City Hall) updates use transcripts and/or public documents to highlight information about Hamilton civic affairs that is not generally available in the mass media. Detailed reports of City Hall meetings can be reviewed at hamiltoncatch.org. You can receive all CATCH free updates by sending an email to http://hamiltoncatch.org/newsletter/?p=subscribe. Sharing links are available on the hamiltoncatch.org.
She's the softest fur baby I've ever touched.
I have missed my crafty blog!
and has been beautifully cultivated into a
Rnd 9: ch 3, dc in next 13 dc, 2 dc in next dc, *dc in next 14 dc, 2 dc in next dc; repeat from* around to last 2 dc; dc in last 2 dc; join with sl st to 1st dc (66 dc)
Green elements
“LET’S DUCK!!” Some peng brownie with some nice wavy hair and chinese eyes shouted out “Tracey’s right, we need to go before they call fedz.” He said, starting up the car. Me, Princess, Wunmi and Klesha looked at eachother with confusion.
Thrash Metal Farmhouse Strong Ale (Draught)
And you know, hypnosis is a powerful thing, it’s something we don’t understand a lot about or by what means one can be hypnotized. You know, Keel points out that you can be driving down a highway and be hypnotized by the rhythmic rhythm of the stripe in the road on a straight road. And he also thinks that when you see these lights that there’s some effect to the lights that puts some people into a hypnotic state. And his belief is that all the things that occur, other than being subjected to the light, are hallucinatory, and that we’re experiencing some kind of a hypnotic hallucination.
For my father, these two items resemble a portable tool chest. They represent the epitome of the Boy Scout motto, “Be Prepared.” For my father, an Eagle Scout, being prepared has been his creed throughout his professional and personal life. These simple tools represent how he can do a lot with a little, how he’s resourceful and compassionate, and how he’s prepared for any challenge he faces.
Well I want loads of em'! The past will always be a smell to me, a TV programme or a well-versed song.
on that sad and somber note, I have to go to a meeting with the officiant for my wedding.
And where is heaven?
Shoes: all mine, all by me. Click on them for details. Multi-image hosting sites here, so that's why they're so randomly sized. Bear with while I figure out how to get all the right sizes where they should be. Until then, enjoy oversized pics.
Dayna Martin brings you a new way to view birth. She breaks down the walls of conventional beliefs and busts through the myths that have been passed down down for generations, even within the naturally-minded birthing community!
split peas - $0.79, water - N/A, smoked sausage - $2.00, chicken bouillon - $ 3.00, carrots - $1.25, celery - $1.99, onions - $1.00, potatoes - 1.56, garlic powder - N/A, orgeano - N/A, bay leaves - $3.70
2 lg eggs
After a few years of enjoying the hyper referential Americana punk of the Gaslight Anthem, it was fun to hear something new from the band that was basically their equivalent 20 years earlier, still plugging away at their weathered greaser mystique more and more convincingly over time.
E.F Gilford scoured the land around his home and recorded many sites unknown to anyone at the time , later in 1960 he was aided by a local researcher B. Pankhurst and they mapped and photographed every Aboriginal site in the Kariong area.
► 2008 (262)
I was hoping Branaugh would push against the confines of Marvel expectations, providing dramatic flourishes, colophons and curlicues, touches of Tom O’Bedlam, Bottom or even King Lear. Something to let us know that a human being directed this movie! That there’s an intelligence, somewhere in the machine. Nolan and Raimi figured out how to do it, as did Favreau, Donner, and Burton, too. Branaugh, with his absurdly high brow resume, should have figured it out. But he didn’t. He doesn’t seem lost, exactly, but more absent. He’s been scrubbed by the abrasive scouring pads of big money.
I took the Visiminder works to a clock shop to be reassembled after I got in over my head LOL. I will give you an update on that soon."*****************************************************************************
All through this epistle we see Paul’s determination to focus on the positive instead of the negative….to see the good in the midst of the bad. In one of Germany’s famous art galleries, a painting called “Cloud Lane” hangs at the end of a long dark hall. It appears at first to be a huge, ugly mass of confused color unattractive and foreboding. Upon closer examination, however, you see an innumerable company of angels.
Whew! It's high time to shut up and go quilt!
I prefer needle turn applique and draw my templates on a feather weight fusible, so the glue leaves an edge I can needle turn against. I did a simple pillow case finish as I didn't want a binding to contrast against the applique. I confess, I had to almost use different buttons, I tore my sewing room and notions drawer apart and found it when I was ready to give up! Sure glad I found these apple buttons! Do you see the blue bird?
07 Chrysalis
However, I am 8 months pregnant, and tired. The fact that I shopped ahead for their easter lambs and a few little goodies, has me quite proud of myself. I've got Resurrection Rolls planned and a "Meaning of Easter" basket planned. But, there are no decorations up for Easter, and since I don't have any to begin with, I am proud of myself for not indulging in the temptation to go out and shop for things we really don't need.
YLSIO Blog (ylsioblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
But I'm going to try change that as of ... right now .
So here is Shuttle 2 wrapped in Lizbeth Brand Thread size 20. This color is Seagreen Lt. I've also taken both sides of the shuttle so that you can see that one side is painted like an Easter Egg and one side is painted like an Easter Basket. In case you are curious the sides on both shuttles are painted brown like the sides of the Easter Baskets and the Easter Basket Handles.
Is it entertaining? Mostly. If you suspend your brain for the duration of the movie. Enough said.
I ate a lot of peanut butter and jam sandwiches as a kid; not because I was picky, but because I just loved them. Sometimes my mom would throw some banana slices in, or swap the jam for honey, but whatever the combo, it was the ultimate comfort food.
including both Fulfillment and Expectation,
The problem is that gluten-free vegan bread is hard to come by and what is out there just doesn't measure up to gluten breads. Sure, I have my loaf of brown rice bread in the freezer and once in a while, Tom toasts it up for my breakfast. I get these 2 teeny-tiny squares of plank bread that can have you volunteering to go on a no-carb diet.
(This, by the way, is pretty much my dream day out: food, wandering around, more food, books, oh and look, some more food. If I could somehow remove the need to shop for clothes from my life and just focus on the other stuff, my cup would runneth over.)
and cold beer, of course
“The car-for-bike swap is the pinnacle of the day, illustrating one person’s true belief in all that a bicycle can offer,” said Bryan Simpson, spokesman for New Belgium. “Bikes represent freedom, fun and fitness while helping the environment. It’s a way of life that we live and share at New Belgium.”
I've been dragging all morning. It's afternoon now, and I still don't have much oomph. But days like today are good for curling up with cozy books like Redwall and Mossflower. I don't know how many times I've read them, but something about the series is relaxing.
Here are a few shots from the trip...
Philip K Dick and Philosophy - a cool book that examines Dick's work (and the cinematic adaptations based thereupon). In response to every review that fails to account for Dick's philosophy in The Exegesis, there is now a book dedicated to the study of that very unity.
we fail to give it a place in ordinary life.”
my sewing machine
I will get Benji out of bed and get him a cup of milk and hold him for a bit until he is ready to run. At this time the boys will roll out of bed and then we will have family prayer before Steve leaves for the clinic.
And that he’s actually not in Bangladesh at all, but working at Goodfellows in East Malvern as a shelf stacker.
PLUS a signed photo kindly donated by the highly talented actor MICHAEL SHEEN, the star of the excellent new film ‘Damned United’. Previously he did a fantastic portrayal of Kenneth Williams; has acted as Tony Blair and played the role of David Frost in the film ‘Frost/Nixon’.
This past week has been filled with family dinners out since Pat came home to visit for a long weekend, reunions with old high school friends that left me feeling reassured that sometimes things are just really easy and comfortable amongst the best of friends even when years have passed, the consumption of enormous pancakes when a trip to the shore didn't pan out (thanks a lot for the faulty report, weatherman), and obviously many trips to Starbucks.
How would you like to "Win" one of my newest soaps? You get to choose a 6 oz. bar of either Organic Oatmeal Honey, Organic Clay Tea Tree, Organic Spring Blossom, Orgaic Exfoliating Almond, or the newest Organic Walnut Apricot!!
Here's what I came up with.
“Really?” the vampire asked, surprised. “And what did young Jerod answer?”
And, being no more in debt to years than thou,
After swallowing this bit of knowledge I strolled (scrolled) on down to this door-
Ink: Jet Black StazOn, SU Markers (Daffodil Delight, Peach Parfait, Pear Pizzazz)
Here are the some sneaks photos while were in Boracay.
A huge thank you to everyone who participated with us last week and for those who did but didn't quite made it to the deadline to submit their card! :) We always, always appreciate your time and effort & grateful that you do share you talent with us.
”We will not be cowed by any fascist, racist or supremacist group. This is a peaceful event and the truth of the cause is manifest.”
** I had trouble making the pastry border, so I removed the excess pastry and cut flower shapes with it using a cookie cutter, then I placed them on top of the filling before baking the tart
I first saw Denjo-san on a TV screen. He appeared as one of the Balkan haijins on a NHK(Japan's national broadcasting station) special program on haiku scene in the area. I found his haiku on the web and made some haiga. In the program many more haijins were introduced, and I later came to know many of them, including Vladimir Devide and Visnja McMaster.
His perception towards the Russians is best summarized by the comic strip below where the Communist party won their election by literally forcing everyone to vote at point gun:
There are those who say life in jail is punishment enough.
So back to the email. It informed me the race was 2 months away. I continued to scroll to the bottom, where I found this:
64. Cf. Inferno, iv. 25-7:
So whatever your qualification, why not consider the engineering sector?
I ordered the Santa Fe Breakfast Burrito. Tah-dah! Just like the meal in the tabletop advertisement — burrito and smoothie! OK, so perhaps the eggs cooked up in my burrito did not look half as appetizing as the eggs in their photo, but it tasted pretty good. The pulled pork, that is, tasted pretty good. The burrito was served with their smashed potatoes (which I have come to greatly adore) and three sauces: tomato salsa, avocado salsa and a cilantro sour cream. I’ve never been big on avocados or sour cream but I have to say, I think I used up every bit of the sauce trio.
"Thinking of you...miss you."
this last week or so, while i've been limiting my internet time, i've not been up to hospital for monitoring. i've been calmer and happier.
She'd just been told the Holy Spirit will come upon her, that God's power will overshadow her, that she'd become with child even though she wasn't married, and she said, "I'm the Lord's servant. Let your words be true."
Those, at least, are some of my meditations to myself about hearing. The last sounds, below, should go to Beethoven. Thank you for listening.
She was a young woman who knew who she was, knew what she was capable of. And she was making him look like a child without him knowing it.
I think that’s down to individual choice. What I might consider to be “too much” could be mild for someone else. I didn’t set out to write the scariest horror books ever written, I set out to tell a story, which just happens to be bloody scary. I would never deliberately up the scares at the expense of character and plot. If the plot demands really full-on horror (like in book four), then I’ll write it. If it requires a lighter touch, then that’s what I’ll try to do. I never think “I’m going to write the scariest story I can”. I think “I’m going to write the best story I can”. For some people those stories might be almost too terrifying to bear, for others they’ll barely raise a goosebump. I’m not that fussed, as long as they enjoy the story.
I wasn't doing fine over the past days. I was having some occasional depression or maybe sadness attacks lately. The usual self-treatment I impose are shopping and pampering. I buy a new book, treat myself for a hair spa, or purchase anything that can make me happy. But lately, I felt that my depression attacks can't be healed by any of my regular regimen.
Many days I choose to do just that — ignore reality. I am not capable, yet, of sustaining that state of vulnerability. My instinct is still to shield. Often upon hearing about other people’s suffering, I look at her face and I feel compelled to alleviate every ounce of pain that she will ever feel. I want to protect her from it all.
On the day Right to Work gave out a leaflet calling for 'unity talks' on the 5th December, but if they actually wanted unity then two things would have happened differently at least. Firstly when the chair of Right to Work attended the steering committee of the National Shop Stewards Network the day before he would have raised this at the time and secondly they would not have organised a 'unity event' the same time as the already publicised Youth Fight for Jobs national conference. It seems that based on this the 'unity project' is just for show, especially considering Right To Work was set up when the NSSN and YFJ already existed in the first place! Nevertheless unity against cuts is welcome but at the moment I am dubious that Right to Work actually want unity with others, and who could argue otherwise based on the facts.
7Instead of their shame
Research found that the people who follow a vegetarian or vegan lifestyle enjoy a number of health benefits. These include:
Some soap makers love to add shea butter in small amounts (5-7% of the total of oils used) because it leaves a small amount of oil in the soap (the parts of the oil that do not transform to a soap, as written above). Some of the components of shea butter are reported to be anti-inflammatory, moisturizing and humectant properties. It also can be used as a sunblocking lotion (but I would’nt DIY with it – not unless you have a tried and tested recipe). Oh, and if you are allergic to latex, watch out with Shea butter, because there might be chance for a cross-allergy (another example for a cross-allergy is that if you are allergic to peaches, you also might be allergic to birch because of the allergens (the substance which the body reacts to in case of an allergy) look a lot alike.
522300 Activities related to credit intermediation (including loan brokers)
I was half hoping the first couple mornings that she wouldn't like it--I was jonesin' for some Zzzz's. But she loves it and for her first year playing, she is doing pretty well. So this old mom will continue to get up in the dark and take her into town for the next 3 1/2 weeks. (Not that I'm counting!) LOL
My husband reached into his pocket, pulled out his wallet and paid for our coffees with a crisp $10.00 bill.
I've dithered for a while on what I really want to do with regards to my hair color. I've thought about attempting to color it back to something approaching my natural hair color, but that would mean all the dark hair pieces I've invested in would no longer work. Recently, I've begun to toy with the notion of going back to red hair, but again, it would be a lot of commitment to getting a professional to get it there, and then red hair fades SO FAST, so the upkeep gets pretty pricey. Also, all of my hair pieces and wigs would no longer work... So... Dark brown it is.
by Heads of the UN,
days of October, our hearts together, beating forever, forever together…
I had been extremely lucky this day as there was chaos shortly after I arrived at work and also shortly before I set off for home.
Beckett Rush, teen heartthrob and Hollywood bad boy, is flying to Ireland to finish filming his latest vampire movie. On the flight, he meets Finley. She’s the one girl who seems immune to his charm. Undeterred, Beckett convinces her to be his assistant in exchange for his help as a tour guide.
at approximately 11:30 AM on Earth Day, April 22, 2011
Firstly I want to share these Layouts because these are of two of my best friends.
During the middle notes/development, you get a very sweet moment like a soft and powdery flowerbomb. It's not always there but resurfaces and can be surprising. Once you get past that moment you have some fruity notes that I don't adore, but they do disappear after 10 minutes or so.
Ink: Momento Tuxedo Black
9. Alexandra Grant, Honor Fraser: Grant works primarily in a metaphoric fashion, using certain systems of color, architectural formations, and patterns to begin her paintings but she intuitively adjusts the systems in order to creating a disjoint between seeing and perceiving, short circuiting her depicted words to a certain extent.
The Hernandez sisters come in and find her. The Hernandez sisters are notorious liars and/or dreamers. There account is unreliable. Rosalita will have to tell people that again and again for the next few weeks.
* Be able to work as part of a team.
The Rosenwald Fund was also one of the original backers of the Tuskegee Syphilis Study. With support from the Rosenwald Fund, an ambitious program had begun to improve the health of African Americans in US southern states in 1928. Emphasis was on treating people with syphilis, then found at a high rate in poor African-American communities.
However, at the same time, is there not something warm and relational about someone asking for your name, and then using it to serve your product. If you’re up for it, then it does lift the experience. Even when you know they’re probably doing it because it’s company policy, what’s wrong with trying to kick-start something more relational? Couldn’t we all get better at seeing the people we engage with in-the-every day, even if it’s the supermarket assistant or the bus-driver, as just that: people?
I don’t know a whole lot about my grandfather either, since he wasn’t present for most of my childhood. I see him perhaps once a month (usually less frequently) now, but that’s only a development of recent years.
Your shelter arrives
One thing I’d like to point out here is that I’m not advertising for this website or service. I advise people to NOT get involved with such things. There’s no way of knowing who is on the other end or what you are actually supporting.
Ricardo Estrada
Let me take you where you let me
When Roux was led out for a short recess minutes later, Taukobong yelled: "I'm going to get your mother, you fucking dog!"
As a transplanted southerner, it will always feel a little weird to call Cambridge, Massachusetts “my hometown.” It will always feel weird for my neighbors as well, for whom the fifteen or so years I’ve lived here are but a drop in the bucket. Still, I’ve been around long enough to see the place change a good deal. With the repeal of rent control shortly after my arrival, a lot of the city’s newcomers— including students, artists and immigrants of all stripes— moved out. Gentrification touched many corners of the city, most visibly Harvard Square, which became a desert of bank offices and optician shops.
So how does this relate to PR? It’s the job of the PR professional to monitor these online and social media conversations. PR professionals must respond to questions and manage conversations, so the image and reputation of the brand are maintained. In today’s world, consumers expect companies to engage them. Consumers want to feel connected to the companies they purchase products from. Social media are tools PR professionals can use to obtain and maintain those relationships and connections with consumers.
Who needs a butcher shop when I buy my meat at the farmers' market?
Fat off!! (…warning…do not say too fast…or with alcohol!!)
Here is the prize you can win from me, 2 stamps and an little assortment of flowers. To be in with a chance of winning just pop your details in Mr linky and leave a comment, simples! The winner will be chosen by random and its open for 2 weeks, good luck!
The idea behind the pattern cards was to be able to mix and match patterns easily, hold them up to each other to decide which ones to use, and even to shuffle them and that way randomly select a handful. I've done all of the above.
Voice Call: an emphatic chi-ca-go just like the Gambel’s, but cheaper delivered and usually 3 notes; sometimes reduced on only 1 or 2 syllables. A wide vary of grunts and razor-sharp cackles are also created.
A little longer afterwards, but I took the time to twitter updates and take a picture of this lovely great silvered mirror dome on the ceiling above a four way intersection, which incidentally showed me with arm in sling and book on knees.
or nothing, bare, fair of skin, my love.
Well, things didn't have that airbrushed and pastel quality, that people are generally going for when they add a new member to the family. So when I got back from China, I stewed a moment and decided to try an anonymous blog. I am pretty angry when I am anonymous. Inadvertently, I also chose a name with less SEO than Kim Kardashian or Bigger Breasts or Weight loss.
The boy done good.
security that it would last.
Littlest Sis had apparently been getting dressed, became tired and decided to take a quick nap. On the floor halfway in the hall. With one leg in her pants. I urged her to at least nap under a blanket. With this parting advice, I left Little Sis in the hallway and went about my morning ritual.
Why 5 November? This date has been chosen as it was officially the day that Russell Hoban completed the novel in 1979. It's also Guy Fawkes Night (aka Bonfire Night), on which British people commemorate the failure of the Gunpowder Plot to destroy Parliament in 1605. In Riddley Walker the characters' quest for the "clevverness" leads to the rediscovery of gunpowder, with explosive results for some of them. (Don't try this at home.)
The inappropriateness of a military response to the threat of terrorism has been noted by a number of counterterrorism experts, such as retired U.S. Army colonel Andrew Bacevich:
Participants then proposed smaller breakout discussions that lasted for 20 minutes before reports back to the full group. Participants select the discussion they want to join by pressing a number on their phones. The five most popular breakout discussions were alternative actions beyond protests, winning the rest of the 99 percent, fundraising tactics, how to bring general assemblies into residential neighborhoods, and electoral reform.
As a man who grew up in the swamp, the American knew that an alligator’s first food instinct was triggered by movement. Although the first scout was no longer moving, the American had pushed the dead body in the direction of the alligator. Pitcher, as his young friends had nicknamed him (for the Pitcher plant native to the swamp), also knew that gators were opportunistic feeders – they would eat pretty much anything that looked interesting as long as it was easy to catch. Pitcher hoped the dead body of the scout would provide just such an opportunistic meal for the nearby bull. He needed a few more minutes of time, un-interrupted by alligator attacks, to take the second scout alive.
Mattison DR, Plowhchalk DR, Meadows MJ, Al-Juburi AZ, Gandy J, Malek A. Reproductive toxicity: Male and female reproductive systems as target for chemical injury. Med Clin North Am 1990; 74: 391-411.
What would Jesus do? Don't ask him; ask yourself and wait for the answer.
4/10- Bad
of bringing South Africa down at the level of Mugabe's Zimbabwe. As it
Some reasons why you might be constipated:
The British soldiers at least had names and faces in the British media. The 16 civilians were just a number for most people. And naturally the authorities started talking about a “lone gunman” as a way of washing their hands of the affair.
Looks so incredibly cheap now but tattoo-looking choker necklaces were the créme de la créme of any boho/goth outfit.
As a whole, I think the design of the website meets the rhetorical purpose of the website very well. The colors, text, attention grabbers, layout, easy accessibility of content and information are all tailored to the purpose of informing and entertaining. The layout and flow of the
King: Of course she did. She insulted the dignity of men.
Sent: May 2, 2012 10:54p
That horrid one day of the year when families take mom out for brunch and fuss over her with eggs Benedict and Mimosas. Then she’s returned to the daily grind and all is forgotten.
While I was looking for the quart of black Benjamin Moore Advance, I saw the chalkboard paint and thought the ultra flat finish could be cool looking, sort of a little like this old Anthropologie iron mirror?
Yes I know that was years ago and the Meiji reformation ended the Samurai, but the traditions of honour and responsibility still remain.
On Monday night, we went and saw David Archuleta's "My Kind of Christmas" concert in Salt Lake City. Now, you may not be a fan. We didn't used to be either. But last Christmas, we saw him perform live with the Mormon Tabernacle Choir for their annual Christmas concert, and that is when we were converted. His voice is seriously A-MAZING. Angelic. Go buy Glad Tidings of Christmas and you'll see exactly what I mean.
In short the military would be lucky to have my little chick in their corner.
I had been consistently seeing a new energy field, codes of color near people’s crown chakra, of blue and red energy… sometimes with white, but consistently with blue and red. I related it to our chakra centers, which is not completely off for the understanding I tried to provide during any session. The red represents the root chakra… our physical life as we are connected to it. The blue, the throat chakra, our self-expression as we walk thru our life.
Predictably, that’s not quite what they said.
The physical impact of spending so many many hours staring at screens (small and large) as opposed to interacting with the "real" world has not yet been fully assessed. Physically we are heavier and weaker than ever in our species' history. Psychologically and spiritually, too, we are experiencing rapid change but it's still too early to say how this will change us.
Having children to read to, and one that has a real passion for novels has brought back my love of reading full force and I'm loving it. Reading, or not reading, will always be a choice for my children, and by having the choice they will remember and retain what they read because it will have been something that interested them enough to want to read about it in the first place. The saying is true "what you learn with pleasure, you never forget".
International Women's Day is the story of ordinary women as makers of history; it is rooted in the centuries-old struggle of women to participate in society on an equal footing with men. In ancient Greece, Lysistrata initiated a sexual strike against men in order to end war; during the French Revolution, Parisian women calling for "liberty, equality, fraternity" marched on Versailles to demand women's suffrage.
Interesting… Paul used what part of the Bible? He used the Hebrew Scriptures. Paul used the Old Testament to show that Jesus was the Messiah; Yeshua HaMashiach in Hebrew. It’s amazing to me how many churches, pastors, and Christians are willing to throw aside the Hebrew Scriptures calling them outdated or not relevant for today. We see Jesus all through the Old Testament! He’s in Genesis, Exodus, Leviticus, and all the way through the Psalms and into the prophets. Friend, you cannot throw out the Hebrew Scriptures without saying that Jesus is no longer relevant. Some would try to say that there are other paths to God. It is true that all paths do lead to God, but there’s only one path that leads to heaven. Everyone will stand before God, but without Jesus, you will be eternally separated from heaven and God at that meeting.
The last time I was down there was on Easter. I took all our Easter guests down there to walk off our Easter ham and other goodies. It was a beautiful day then too. Today, like on that day, it was low tide.
The goal of ABP World Group international child recovery services is to locate, negotiate and recover your missing child.
I’ve known Thomas for a few years now and have had the pleasure of playing bass and bass synth in his band. He was aware of my work as an artist and writer and asked me if I’d like to be involved in The Floating City. Needless to say, I jumped at the chance.
I think this is when he said my favorite quote of the day which was basically, "If something comes out craggy and kind of ugly, just call it rustic. If it's rustic, it can be as ugly as you want and it doesn't matter." Works for me! I'm pretty sure everything I'll be making will be called rustic from now on since, well, mostly everything I make is kind of ugly. Generally delicious, but ugly.
- Journalist John Doran reaches the end of his tether while waiting for Marilyn Manson to turn up for a scheduled interview, 2009.
You see, I had one of these:
Well, I guess my birdie has been sold to a nice old couple and my Pop-Pop is in the ER… Not the news I wanted 5 days before leaving the state…
The trick is the mess that can’t be vacuumed, dusted, or tossed in the nearest trash can. The mess of one’s truth layered with another’s lies. The mess of he said she said that ends with one begging and another bragging.
We cross paths with so many people in a lifetime. How we look at them and how we treat each one says a lot about our character. Do we really see each person? Do we think we are a pretty good person because we discount only some of the people we meet? Only the ones who don't have the drive to "be" someone, to achieve enough to be recognized. That's all right, isn't it? We can justify ignoring and thinking less of some others because we have worked hard to be who we are, to get where we are, and it is good to be proud of our achievements. Crossing paths with someone who may want something from us, or who might take some of our precious time is only an inconvenience. We don't need to be respectful of each one we meet; some of them just don't deserve it.
Most of my photos were of the excursions, so I'm disappointed to not have more to share. But, I'll leave you with this one of Alex participating in an Animal Quiz Show. She was in the final THREE out of the 30-40 who started! Mostly adults! And, one of the 'final three' was a couple and the other was a zoology professor!!! I'm very proud of Alex and her knowledge of animals!
Robert Bloch – The Plot Is The Thing
Returned I am and may yet need my script for another cite and Anthony may think me crazy, but I’m not it is the repetitive clash of words everywhere words. All I see are warnings and threats and vicious control.
“I don’t work for the government. I’m a volunteer. This little boy, Gursel, needs help and he needs it NOW. I’m not leaving this hospital until you admit him and do what needs to be done to save him!! If I have to sleep here in the corridor with him, well then, I’ll do that.” She snorted.
the one who relies on it
I was a terrible student when I was younger. Never a bad kid -- didn't do drugs or hang with the bad crowd or mouth off, was just really quiet. I ignored school and read/wrote in the back of the class, needing both an outlet and escape from the hell of my life. I never studied EVER. It's amazing that I actually did do well in some classes. Because I never studied, I did horribly in math but excelled in English, but the math deficiency weighed heavily on me.
So if you’re reading this, and you’re of a political bent, advocate for tax-relief for childcare when the politicians come knocking on your door. Or we might as well bring back the marriage bar.
¼ cup Amaretto
There are drawbacks to this from the marketing point of view. My books aren’t all shelved in one place; they come from different publishers and don’t share a “look”, so I’m not particularly known for any one thing. But I wouldn’t want to limit myself to one age-group or genre. After finishing a long and challenging older novel, it’s refreshing to turn to something shorter and lighter, such as a rhyming picture-book text or a little story about a dog and a narrowboat. And it gives a lovely variety to my school and library visits: I might be reading to five-year-olds one week, talking to year nine or sixth-form the next.
I did alot of good work this school year. But my three best assignments where: My dictator prpject about Lenin for Ethics, My proyecto de investigación for spanish, and my carta de Jamaica for Sociales. These three things where the best I did in the whole year and they all have something in common. I worked alot harder in ththese assignments because of different reasons. For example In ethics I was told that this project was a significant part of my grade, this motivated me to work alot harder. In spanish I was a free reaserch project so I was working on something I was really Interested in. And in sociales I was told that this specific assignment was very importand and was going to e harshly graded.
into sky above
See you in Vagueness!
I pray thee watch when bright Polaris glows,
I spent a lot of my time in seminary with other Presbyterians, only a lot of them weren’t black-and-white at all. And I spent a lot of time with people whose roots were in many other denominations and expressions of Christian faith. And they weren’t very black-and-white, either. The best conversations I had in seminary were with other students whose roots were dangling in space just like mine. We were all in transition.
It's been a little while since we've done a Shelf Report, so here are some updates on what's out there, what you might have missed and what's coming up.
Hugs to us!
- Once upon a Time
* More incredible scenery on US 40 through Utah, especially where it passes Starvation and Strawberry Reservoirs and drifts over the Daniels pass.
How’s it going for you these days?
Last month the prison population in England and Wales reached 98 per cent capacity – a figure of 57,583.
at an appropriate moment as you listen intently to unique ideas or someone's story.
-Check out local Open Houses. Dress up in your best outfits and check the realty section. Spend the day giggling at stranger’s decorating choices and find new ideas for your own abode.
handshake and goodbye.
serious there is no over playing it. Oldman as Shen is having a blast as a villain, and thankfully he plays it to the max, creating a villain that is going ahead with his plan with out any consideration for others. All the others are perfectly fine and it was nice to have Jackie Chan doing a little more in this movie, as he wasn’t given much in the first one.
5). In the end, however, Kamm does arrive at an essential insight: "My own interpretation of this idiosyncratic record is that, having established his anti-Communist credentials, Reagan's 'soft diplomacy' approach worked well at exactly the time it was needed. It was puzzling, but effective, and probably no one else could have done it". In other words, Reagan was no rigid ideologue. Ideals are not ideology. Ideology and grand theories are for Leftists. Conservatives are pragmatic and flexible. Conservatives have ideals but in pursuing those ideals they go by what works. And our Ron showed that flexibility and pragmatism to brilliant effect.
I don’t know. However, I know where I want to be in ten years. I want to be done with my Optometry Doctor degree (O.D. degree) and possibly have done my Masters in Microbiology. I want to be married to a financially, mentally, physically, as well as spiritually stable man, who is a couple of years older. I want to have already written at least one book on either overcoming depression as a disease, or maybe a fiction book about a Pakistani young man living in Mexico. I want to be a frequent contributor and an expert on eye-health issues for Prevention magazine. I want to have established an Islamic educational organization that deals with informing the Non-Muslims that are either elderly, deaf, blind, or homeless about Islam. Lastly, I’ll just throw in some cute little kids (no more than two) that I’ll be raising with utmost care. There is a LOT more that I want to do, but in ten years, this seems like quite a bit.
100g dark chocolate
I don’t do many outfit posts as I started the blog to photograph what was in my wardrobe as a kind of image archive, but it has morphed into other types of posts over time. I'm also more interested in photography as a medium to convey the desirability of objects (hence the blog’s focus on that type of imagery).
“To dinner, or to my taking the job in Valentine?”
7. The Feeling Is Inside (White, Argent) 3:51
Of narrow-mindedness
This sucks.
To Become One Stop IT Solution provider in web domain with the commitment to deliver End-to-End, Creative, Quality Solutions at Cost Effective Terms to our esteemed customers.
It's been a somewhat eventful number of months since last I posted here. This site as you can see, though, has not been very eventful. The simple reason for that is that I have been preparing a new location for my bizarre ravings to be hosted. Yes that's right... a new blog. What will happen to From Beyond Depraved, you ask?* FBD, for all intents and purposes, is deceased.
With Briant now performing the scalpelwork, we get the series’ most graphic and unpleasant operation scene yet, as the chalk-white corpse has his scalp lifted off, a literal skull-cap, and his brain (bigger than we’ve been used to seeing) deposited in the Incredible Bulk. Alone, unshaven and exhausted after the lengthy procedure, Cushing muses to himself, “If I have succeeded this time, then every sacrificewill have been worthwhile.” Add up the body count from the previous films, and those sacrifices could form quite a heap. This is the Baron’s most introspective moment in any of the films, and spoken by the haggard, aged Cushing (always gaunt, but now prematurely shrivelled at 60) it has chilling resonance.
ON SALE: Friday, April 20 at 10:00 AM at LiveNation.com, all Ticketmaster
LOST MARBLES
Whatever it is, whoever it is, it cracks you open – you stand there naked, raw…you are finally living as you. As your core. As the true you. Your heart, your soul. And the world itself has shifted as you no longer see it through layers of ideas. You see it for what it is. You are finally living, finally feeling life within you and beyond you, because there is nothing standing between you and life anymore. You just are and life just is. You are no longer a slave to your mask of protection, your mask of identity, your masked view of the world.
- not to burden my laptop with too much info
English is not a subject that is very friendly to Christian beliefs
Regardless, T. didn’t seem insulted by my previous “rejection” so a time was arranged for him to make the trek downtown in his fancy car (yes, it was he of the bum warmer).
I do a lot of printing on my 710. Of course if you didn’t why would you even be looking at this item.
Wofford Alumni Executive Council
I may be forced to shop! Damn it! Nothing like shopping to take the fun out of getting new clothes. Sigh. I now have a cleaning person and a personal trainer so perhaps I should look for a personal shopper next to avoid this kind of thing in the future.
My thoughts are clearer and I'm not near as bloated.
In the meantime, the blitz brought some awesome new followers to our little corner of the Internet. Hi new followers!
DONCASTER
Still, we were soon off to Achouffe to the Brasserie d'Achouffe and a glass of the Chouffe Houblen. Supposedly the original Belgian IPA, forerunner of Raging Bitch and Queboid perhaps? Regardless, probably my favourite beer of the weekend.
I have some personal food goals this week.
Please, allow me to be shallow for a little while. I must, I must.
but each of the plants at lowe's has an attached care meter.
My first blog wasn’t pretty. It was about the things I liked, mainly sports. Eight years later, me and my friend now run one of the more successful Chicago Sports blogs on the web.
___ requests for something I can’t provide, e.g. “I need your help to make my dream become a reality”? I just run a blog here.
3 - Live Forever
T3-M3 is a Good Workaholic who’s Mean-Spirited, Eco-Friendly, and a Party Animal. He wishes to be a Renaissance Sim (which I believe means to max three different skills), and likes ratatouille, indie music, and the color orange.
born: 9/24/1982 — married: 1/22/2010
Possible Causes
- watching both of our favourite teams (Barcelona football club and the Vancouver Canucks) go down in flames this week. I went with Rob and the kids for the first time to watch the football match between Barca and Madrid at the bar this week, and what a disappointment. For Barcelona to lose the game is bad enough but for Real Madrid to seal the deal to be the Liga champions this year is very tough for the Catalan with the history between the two cities. And again last night, for Barca to not be able to supercede Chelsea in the Champions League means that they won’t win any big trophy this year. Rob and Marko went to watch it at the bar with a few of the other school dads (Marko is just one of the grown-ups when it comes to soccer). And again, they came home disappointed.
soy sauce
Once again... me no savvy with all things techy, but I think you should get my posts via email when I publish them.
Time: 1:00 PM
More than you might think, Raj. Take Robert Proctor, for example, who has recently published a weighty tome about smoking in which he calls for tobacco prohibition. Patel very much admires Proctor, of course, but dare not mention the P word. Instead, he talks about 'abolition'.
Marko served in the Army and was stationed at Fort Bragg in North Carolina. After leaving the military the six-foot seven forward/center played basketball for a Junior College and was recruited on scholarship to play for St. Augustine. Marko Hamlin, attending the College of Southern Maryland, was named the NJCAA Division II Men’s Basketball Player of the Week, Dec. 21, 2006. There were promises made by people who worked for St. Augustine, ensuring that Marko would be financially taken care of, that were not kept. This situation quickly soured Marko’s confidence and trust in those he once believed, supportive of his gifts and talents, and he left college to embark on a journey that he did not know would lead him to love, God.
For example, the average 2010 Child Tax Credit refund would pay for the family’s meals for three months, according to the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s lowest-cost meal plan. Or a couple of months rent on a two-bedroom apartment in a low-cost area.
1/2 cup of organic fresh fruit - bananas, raspberries, strawberries, peaches, blueberries, blackberries, cantaloupe - to name a few (mix it up by using several fruits to equal 1/2 cup)
Submit a caption for The New Yorker cartoon posted below.
Now, did I go against direct advice of a medical professional?
Après avoir vu au ciné Avengers (qui est pas mal du tout !), un petit hommage à Black Widow, interprétée par Scarlett Johansson (miam !) dans le film.
If you are looking for a unique tool to help you organize case information on the go without having the burden of carrying heavy and bulky transcripts, this is an app for you. The cost is $49.99 and the developer promises that updates and technical support will be free.
Education, as with all aspects of culture, is greatly impacted by the forward progress of technology. Several blogs are maintained by well-known individuals in the field of education. These top 10 technology blogs address technological developments as these innovations relate to education. Many of the top 10 blogs are maintained by those who specialize in integrating technology with education. Most bloggers on the list are renown in the educational field and all offer great ideas and insights for teachers and others interested in using technology to enhance traditional educational methods.
Bad News, Austin only...for the immediate future. Don't be alarmed, it will find it's way all over, but looks like some of us will have to make a road trip.
At the age of 28, a run of good injury free form could see the ex-Everton man give the green half of Glasgow a timely boost in the title race.
I thought that I'd photographed all of Newcastle's park until I remembered about Brandling Park. It's more of a bowling club with a couple of small grassy areas around it but it counts as a park all the same so on my way back from a trip around Gosforth I thought I'd grab a few photos.
Well it is now six years since my breast cancer diagnosis! And the start of my second life! Hey hey, its good to give myself two birthdays! I had my biopsy on the 9th March and my first operation (a masectomy) on the 31st of March 2004. In fact, I got out of hospital just in time for Easter, and still remember the mix of fear (I hadn't got my pathology report back yet) and pure wonder at the way everything was painted more brightly, scents were keener, the breezes softer.
I figure, ya gotta have a big ol' bowl of hearty goodness to compete with bowl games and my chili is just perfect for me.
Although some games encourage it, camping spawn points and corpses is generally a lame tactic. In many cases it’s only possible because of flawed game design, but it’s still a weak strategy that players with any dignity don’t resort to.
We'll practice trickle down economics and you can continue to give trickle up poverty your best shot.
2052.E-I/7/1997. “Caution Must Be Used in Judging Politicians.” Hyde Park Herald, Chicago, Illinois, p. 4. See, also, ibid, p. 1. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(11), above, p. 108, n. 21.)
I know debt is tough on people. And I know that it is tempting to step away from responsibility. But it is wrong. Really it is as simple as that. Our Lord said, “Let your yes be yes, and your no, no” (Matthew 5:37). If you say yes to a loan, you are saying yes to the payments. That is all I will say…maybe.
In the show Robert lightens up dark places, and in one place he reorganized the kitchen for optimized performance. Let’s apply these concepts to a non restaurant
I'm late in all my work projects due to staying home so much... bad
Well, the Postal Service is certainly covering all of its bases with that language, leaving room to tweak proposals and change plans/minds. I suppose one can never be too careful and cautious when one is a government entity. Meetings will be held in the affected communities to review options, which could take more than two years to implement.
Step Two: Read instructions.
Children with aspergers syndrome and other ASD's often have vastly different needs to their neurotypical counterparts. Chief among these needs is the need for visual and experiential learning.
Him: "Wow, I just re-filled his bottle a few hours ago"
10. List two news ledes to avoid, according to Harrower. List two feature ledes that succeed (according to Harrower, again).
“Where do you wanna go, slut?” that person grab Junsu’s right wrist.
Typically, the interviewer begins by setting the scene. They invite the viewer into the conversation by introducing the location, guest and topic. At this point the interviewer is probably speaking to the camera as if they were looking the viewer in the eye.
Maybe I just couldn’t imagine
But of course being a mom doesn’t work that way. Nope, being a mother is looking at that face and feeling that fear and finding some way to coexist with it. Because whatever the next moment holds, that smile right now in this moment is somehow all that matters.
Have a great day! Thank's for stopping by today and for any comment you may leave!
His reputation is too damaged to ever make a political comeback. Even if he did the whole bare his soul confession and ask for forgiveness routine.
With squid-hater George away at the weekend we feasted.
Need to catch up?
The first threat to the Americans “master plan” for global hegemony came in November 2000 when the former Iraqi leader Saddam Hussein quit accepting US Dollars for oil and, instead, stated his country would only accept Euros. In less than 10 months an attack on the US was engineered and used that as an excuse to topple Hussein and reestablish the US Dollar as the world’s main reserve currency.
MASS ARRESTS
their bodies gone -
It didn't pan out that way. Yeah, the long-running Clinton/Obama battle last time out made for both good press and tested each candidate, such that folk had a good idea of what they were voting for by the end of it. But this multiple-clown-car-pileup that is the GOP selection process has been going on way too long. The early primary/caucus schedule did not coronate a clear leader, but left an ongoing "Tune in Next Week" feature to the ongoing drama. The debates were just terrible, in that they revealed more about the mob than about the candidates (It is apparently OK to boo servicemen, the dying, the uninsured, the elderly, the media, black people, people who ask follow-up questions, and black people in the media who ask follow-up questions). The entire process has taken on a train-wreck nature to it all.
Kuah:
9/26 – Santa Cruz, CA – The Catalyst
So last week, House Armed Services Subcommittee on Readiness held hearings intended to question any such expenses under the cover of considering "energy security." A lot of the, you'll pardon the expression, energy went out of the hearings when it developed that for the most past, most of the programs the Pentagon was involved in involved private investments and cost taxpayers almost nothing - and the energy obtained from these projects will cost less than if they had gotten it from conventional sources. It will actually save money.
Diane frowned, unconvinced. She needed an explanation of this inconsistency between John's actions and his words. They had been together for ten years, ever since they were both in their teens, in fact. They had known each other even longer than that. Their parents had been friendly with one another. Although never in the same class (John was a year older) she and John had attended the same school. John had been her first boyfriend. When they first got together, John's parents had been a little unsure about the relationship. When they had been together for a while and showed no signs of falling out they let it be known that they thought John should “get a little more experience” of life before getting involved further. Diane -perhaps uncharitably, perhaps not- always felt that, at that time, they wanted John to “do better” for himself. He had ambitions to be an architect and she thought they probably liked the idea of him forming a relationship with another well-paid professional. If so, they were far too civilised to actually say so outright. Neither did they ever do anything to positively thwart the relationship. Instead they pursued an almost Gandhi-like campaign of passive resistance to acknowledging the young couple's feelings for one another. Diane's parents, on the other hand, had always accepted the easy inevitability of the situation.
Pearce has too much power in the national game at the moment. His role as England caretaker should preclude his role with TeamGB for the coming Olympic Games. Any words he speaks now in the latter capacity carry an undercurrent of the former. With Spurs demise and fall from Grace, there is no guarantee that Redknapp will now be named for the England role permanently, despite the desire of David Bernstein that this should happen. With Roy Hodgson and perhaps Alan Pardew, as the only real English contenders for the role in the Premier League, Pearce being appointed to the national team on a full-time basis cannot be ruled out.
Phone calls are received and made - usually whilst walking through the house sipping coffee, enjoying the view of snow on the Jura mountains and pushing in the dining chairs as I pass.
For further information:
I will be back each day this week with some fun stuff... a Penny Black post, an Avocado Arts post, a fun announcement post, a new SPARKS challenge, etc!! So.... make sure to check back each day!
Studio TangoVida
Same thing Saturday. Collins, not brand loyal to his so-called “closer,” saw trouble on the horizon and felt the need to take Frank Francisco out, only to see the Luis Castillo redux but starring two new players: Ruben Tejada and Kirk Nieuwenhuis. These games give me flashbacks and make me wonder if Post-Traumatic Mets Disorder should be classified by the psych community.
But Wheaties has fallen on to hard times of late. There are many reasons, but industry insiders say that the heart of the matter is simple.
Tuesday, March 29 - Club Soda - Montreal PQ
Information first
There is a new blog on the block run by one of my blogging friends Mindi- Utah Sweet Savings. Have you been watching the extreme couponing show? {I have} Do you look for a good deal? {I do}Do you like a giveaway? {me}Utah Sweet Savings is the site for you. They collect all the best deals available from the sites such as Groupon but also for brand sites and more so you can go to one place to find it all. Ever wonder how those extreme couponers get everything for free or pretty close to it? Utah Sweet Savings has a series of how to videos for you. They also have a weekly giveaway. This week they have two giveaways. One is a $50 Walmart gift card. The other is two tickets to the Mary Poppins Broadway play! Go check them out. Seriously it's pretty awesome!
1 oz sweet vermouth
The waiting. It never ends. You wait to hear back on queries. Then partials. Then offers of rep. Then publishing houses. Then editors notes. Then second-round notes. Then copy edits. Then cover art. Then proofs. Then ARCs. Then schedules. Then blurbs. Then OMG YOU ARE THE ZEN FUCKING MASTER OF WAITING.
Skint. That describes my childhood years. No money for new records and no effing downloads. What were my options? Systematic taping from the radio and second hand stalls.
We must stop lying against the
Take with a full glass
DISCLOSURE. in all i've read about and video watched it seems like all the believers seem to be pushing for disclosure from our government, i'm guessing from instances like the roswell spaceship crash and the sort and i'd like to know as well but if that's what they're waiting for just so they could have the proof, to me it's kinda dumb, 1. because the truth, i believe, will come from "one of us" or themselves touching down then saying Hi we're here where's the party at.?! and 2. why would anyone think and it seems like to me that's what everyone feels, but why would anyone believe if aliens made contact that they'd only deal with our government.? anyway.. the reason i'm making this post is because of a video i just watched that looks absolutely astonishing to me and if it's real i have a few observations.. one is "they" must look upon their ufo's like we do our cars because in this video alone there's many different ships in a short amount of time and by them being small it coincides with my "motheship" theory. watch the video if you haven't already...
to enter. If you upload to SCS, please use the keyword BBB19. You have until February 29th to enter! As we unveil our challenge for next month, we’ll share our True Beauties – those card makers who wowed us with this challenge! Winners will be featured on the Flourishes Blog and will
The Second World War ensured there were no games in 1940 or 1944, so the 1948 London Games were the next. The British organisers might have consigned the torch relay to the oblivion it deserved. Instead, they decided it was ‘traditional’ and kept it. The British have a long history of inventing traditions – but few as unsavoury as the Olympic torch.
What I don’t understand is this. A decent amount on both sides ( I won’t say all because I know both that don’t act this way) spend most of their time telling the other one that they are wrong. Atheists and Believes talk about God just as much. I feel there is a lot of wasted energy in telling someone what they do or don’t believe is wrong when it comes to faith or lack thereof. Instead of being reasonable people it sounds like a school yard fight to me. And have chosen to take myself out of it.
In “Family and relationships” there is a feature for “First met...” I suppose it is meant for the first meeting with your only true love. But what if I start adding colleagues whom I met at various professional conventions? That would be an exciting timeline! Especially if their memories of our first encounter are different from mine.
into the doorway, a rifle's broken back, and I feel nothing;
08. Hi Fi Mama – 2:23
So moving right along to Europe, let’s say you want to see some ancient ruins. Check out downtown Detroit instead. If experiencing the Autobahn is more to your liking, rent a Dodge Viper and head to North Carolina, then get on Interstate 95 north and fly all the way into Washington D.C. That German highway can’t hold a candle to some of our very own interstates when it comes to insane drivers.
UPDATE: Something is up with the comment section on this post. Maybe it will all work itself out but what’s going on is it’s saying there are a certain amount of comments but when you click on the comment button, it says there are two and that’s all that’s showing up. Anyone else ever have this problem? I tried posting again and it seems to be fine. But this one is messed up. Why is Blogger such a devil?
Friends With Benefits
The center part is making a strong comeback for spring. 70′s glam makes me happy. Anything other than 90′s era grunge-punk makes me happy…
My plan now is to make it again, I will have to buy more fabric, but this time I will measure the pattern pieces many times, and attempt an FBA (which makes no sense as it’s gathered under the bust, maybe will extend the side seam). As I put the zip at the side not the back, will cut the back as one piece, but without a big chunk in the middle…
In the first world countries, many of the parents of today have had music tuition at some stage in their lives. If you look at Sweden, Denmark, Norway, Germany, England, Italy, USA, to name only a few examples, hundreds of children are performing and composing music by the time they reach High School. Playing an instrument develops parts of the brain, co-ordination and small motor skills like no other activity does. It encourages discipline and social interaction and brings much joy to themselves and family members, as whole families play together at home as part of their family inter action. No money can buy family time.
It never fails that when things seem to bother me I can go to the place of worship that celebrates my beliefs and hear a message that is so apropos. And yesterday was just that. Last week when I was trying to relay my feelings about this stamp to the person that sent it to me, suddenly the phrase "what would Jesus do" came to mind. I don't profess to be a Christian per se but I do have a spiritual belief. And the message in my place of worship yesterday was just that.
To help, two phychologists co-authored a book titled Teenage as a Second Language: A Parent’s Guide to Becoming Bilingual. The book suggests that learning to speak "teen" is the same as learning to speak French or Spanish.
once the year ends.
Mr. Wagner was celebrating his 30th birthday, and Mr. Rogers ambled over to say hi. (Maybe he was bored – it was just a month after he’d taped the final episode of Mister Rogers Neighborhood.)
3. M/S Invention 9:02
So, for all my past customers and new ones to be...
A few of you already know about the One Kitchen, Many Hearts (OKMH) project. This group of crazy fun ladies found each other on the internet and decided we had to stay connected. Now, every other month, we receive a package full of goodies in the mail from one of our fellow internet sistahs.
Hey idiot voters, vote for someone who will remove the bridge concessionaire usage fees for those earning below $4000, or lower the Election deposit from 15,000 to 150 ringgit. Remember that this is the same party who would assign itself (actually LGE and Wife) tax payer monies of 750K (Chiefminister LGE himself) and 120K (Assemblyperson LGE’s wife) respectively for their own funerals. Or similarly the old folks giveaway cash which some old folks out of ethical concerns refused?
$4.00 off any Zegerid OTC Product
They would find out soon enough.
Roast the whole bird as you normally would, but make sure to also put the gizzards and neck in the roaster as well. Don't just toss them because they look gross or you wonder who would ever want to eat them. It won't matter to your soup stock what they look like!
An outfit to travel in
Instead, the operating environment, the larger system with which ENIAC interacted, literally pulled the plug on the grotesque monster, withdrawing its life support.
5-Limeade
The main problem with this film is not to do with the production values, however, as these are mostly pretty good: and there is of course a lush and atmospheric James Bernard score to be savoured. The problem is that, despite the fact that Dracula gets some good material and the film is occasionally striking and involving, it’s essentially bereft of new ideas. Taste the Blood of Dracula had interesting things to offer on the subjects of morality and the clash of generations – but Scars of Dracula isn’t really about anything beyond Dracula noshing on his guests and mistreating his staff. It’s simply a very mixed bag of elements, all present for different reasons, and as a result the film lacks the strong identity of the best Hammer Draculas. Still sort of fun, though.
With the choices in the grocery store being somewhat limited, I find that even my food starts to look a little..monotone. Well, if you find that happening to you then pull out this recipe. It looks super pretty, tastes good and is a nice go to for parties and other times when you need to impress. Serve it with tortilla chips and enjoy!
I applaud the American media for trying to involve America into yet another war.
Saturday 22nd January: Burridge play their first game of 2011 in boggy conditions at Whiteley.
Anyway, peaceful thoughts.
Water purifiers with silver impregnated filters led the parade
1) Spent twenty hours this weekend helping my son revise and edit thirty pages of writing for his online course (you try explaining to an 18-year-old why he can't write a three page prompted store about a life epiphany, and have the conclusion be 'I don't really have an epiphany'). I really am wondering what it would be like to be one of those parents who just had to worry about what they were going to wear to the senior awards ceremony on May 1st.
I’ve also given the site a new name: Moving Target. Because that exactly describes the process of bringing out a book. A writer spends months, perhaps even years, writing the manuscript. Then months more rewriting it. And when the book is honed and polished to its writer’s satisfaction, it may take many more months or years to find a publisher.
Woo Hoo. The mailman delivered it today thankfully. I was beginning to sweat. I hugged it. Bruce took a picture of that! I think I might have had a tear in my eye..haha.
Dr Albert
And it's the little things outside of the gym too. Like hearing the cacophony of birdsong beginning as I leave the house at 5.40am on a Saturday. Like being absolutely ravenous for breakfast, and knowing I can enjoy every mouthful. Like having my kids interested in 'Mummy's boot camp', and wanting to exercise with me. Like knowing that I am finally doing something for my own mental health and wellbeing.
Off I dashed to pick up my peeping box. I came home with four sweet little feathered ladies. Meet our newest flock members:
Crown Princess Mary
LET’S give it up for my husband and graphic/web designer. He’s credited with investing time and effort to help me begin to understand the wonderful world of technology via the iPad back when I knew very little – including how to develop and run this very blog! He brings a unique and different perspective to this project from the inside out. Thanks for taking the time to contribute your observations:
A big thanks to you three who participated in the break and I hope you all had some fun.
The story may take place in future dystopian Chicago, but I was totally there. The factions and their inner-workings and intra-connections. The world of the Dauntless. Yep. I was there too.
happy eyes dancing.
Which, if proved correct, certainly wouldn't be 'fair.'
Is it possible for me to collect and not spend? We will see in 2012.
“Private lenders are doing it for an increasing share of their (mortgage portfolios) when it makes sense,” Andrew Jakabovics, a research director at Enterprise Community Partners, told reporters in a panel discussion following DeMarco’s Brookings speech. “If (Fannie and Freddie) aren’t willing to do it, there are plenty of investors who are buying these notes because economically it makes a lot of sense.”
Pretty pink blossoms, Easter treats, fluffy cat naps, good times with great friends, FINALLY seeing The Hunger Games on a date night with Mike, and sunny morning walks with the pup are all the ingredients that made for a fabulously fun and relaxing weekend. How did you guys spend yours?
Do you like soft drinks?
Picking the bones of the Big-12 carcass would be an easy fit and huge shot in the arm for the conference. In this scenario, the SEC has added Texas, Oklahoma, and Oklahoma State to join recently added Texas A&M in the west division. Here's the visual:
The frosty wind bites my nose and cheeks
I ended up getting married almost out of high school so my implants would have to wait. My husband and I got pregnant a little after a year of being married. We purchased no bottles or formula because I was going to breast feed, I was determined, and I was not going to give up like I felt other mothers did too often. My daughter was born at 10lbs 4oz and I started her on the breast right away. I felt like things were going normal for breast feeding, didn't have much to compare to. The hospital requested I supplement with some formula while in the hospital though because my supply hadn't come in yet and my daughter was appearing to be hungry, they thought it was due to her large size. By the time I left the hospital my breasts had grown slightly bigger and heavier, so I'd assumed my supply was in and we wouldn't have to use formula anymore. My daughter was on my breast constantly and literally nonstop. I just figured this was normal and she was just hungry. She would fuss if I tried to take her off. Finally I got her to unlatch to go to bed but the screaming started shortly after. She wouldn't stop and I tried putting her back to the breast, but ultimately gave in, and we drove 30 minutes away at 3 in the morning to get formula and bottles.I lasted for about three months trying to feed. If my daughter wasn't latched on I was hand pumping with the pump the hospital gave us. My husband even went and purchased me the best automatic pump on the market. I could only pump an ounce and a half on a good pump. Finally I felt as though I just gave up and resorted to formula feeding.
The scene on Sparrow Hills was one, it’s not a place tourists tend to go but it gave Billi one hell of an introduction to Moscow.
Busy, busy, bee. And trying to ignore the panic that’s mounting from the lack of time and amount of work that is demanding my attention.
Joe Bageant (1946‐2011) was an American transcendentalist, author and columnist known for his books Deer Hunting With Jesus – Dispatches from America’s Class War and Rainbow Pie – A Redneck Memoir. In his two books Bageant illustrated the lives and struggles of America’s permanent poor white underclass. Bageant’s primary field of study was Winchester Virginia, the small town he was born in, left during the hippie era and returned to 35 years later.
While in Boston on a holiday visit, DP, Miss B, and I took a little road trip to visit my sister-in-law in western Massachusetts. While there, we made a stop at one of my favorite used bookstores in the world, The Montague Bookmill (also the possessor of the best slogan in the history of business, “Books you don’t need in a place you can’t find”), so I could spend the gift certificate my SIL had thoughtfully given me for Christmas. We had a good long browse for books, and also had lunch at the café.
Tailless ewe #41 seems to be fine, and she and the others grow rounder and rounder each day as we get closer to March, which by the way, is when we expect to get lambs LOL
I recently had the pleasure of working with a darling bride. She wanted a unique wedding invitation for their small, intimate wedding. Her young daughters were going to be a part of the ceremony with a small gathering of family and friends in her home. She wanted the sweet nature of the ceremony reflected in the invitation that was to be hand delivered to each guest.
your salt-stained smile a kaleidoscope thing
A:�Storing memory is not a problem, Retrieving it is the problem.
2) Scroll down to the bottom of this post and click on the link to enter your blog.
I don’t think I am able to answer this question properly. I do have a friend who is like my inner voice. I am eternally grateful for her, and I know that I can talk to her about anything with no judgment, just advice. She’s there to simply listen, if that’s what I need, and she’s there to yell at me for being a moron when I so often am one.
Chapter 2, Food, is a description of Japanese foods and ingredients, with additional Japanese terminology, and some restaurant and shop suggestions. There are also some brief essays on related topics such as umami and sushi etiquette. This is also an excellent reference section for anyone who wants to learn more about Japanese cuisine, and once again useful for deciphering a menu at any Japanese restaurant. In this chapter, you will learn about the heirloom vegetables of Kyoto, a famous restaurant which serves horse meat, a seasonal list of seafood, the poisonous fugu, and much more. Just note that the individual sections are brief, and are more a basic introduction than an indepth study of each topic.
And what made Morris special to us was his kindness. Pure gentle kindness from a man who probably would have scared the living daylights out of anyone if he wasn’t dressed in an ice cream
Heading back to the clean(er) water of the brook we headed downstream to the outfall. Proceed with caution from here. It's silty and full of potholes. We got back above ground and walked back to the car in our waders. Weird looks FTW.
So apparently, there is a website called (ironically enough) "The American Thinker." And apparently, this website employs someone known as "Robin of Berkeley." I can't find any pictures of Ms. OfBerkeley, so I will just go ahead and assume that this is a fairly accurate artist's rendition:
Monica is insanely talented. And she is such a great friend. The kind that if you casually mention you can't get the kids together because everyone in the house is sick, you'll find chicken noodle soup on the back porch twenty minutes later.
$1.00 off Pillsbury Refrigerated Cookie Dough
This role requires great skill indeed to practice; serious attention needs to be paid by the playworker to his or her own internal dilemmas – their personal rites and trials – in order for the endevour to be authentic, as well as close attention paid to the external context within which they are bound to both influence and be influenced by. Gordon Sturrock summarises this process as a (meta)ludic dialectic.
I thought Joyce and George were awesome. A little cliche with the door thing, but as awful as the Leviathans are, they're FUN.
Dara rose from her sleeping mat and slipped outside. Fiery Mount Aege towered above all, a silent menace in the northwest. An unnatural stillness hovered in the leaden dawn. No birds chirped from the bare branches of trees. No small animals scurried through the fallen leaves on the forest floor. She peered through cold, curling autumn fog, shivering as thunder rumbled closer. The clarion call of trumpets pierced the silence, followed by the shriek of a wounded charger.
The first reason for the shopping trip was to take two rings into the jewellers to have the diamonds put back in them. One of them was my grandma's engagement ring which was given to me when she died and the other is my engagement ring. Last week I noticed that the claws on my ring felt sharp so I thought that I had better check how secure the diamond was and as I touched it, it came out in my hand. The jeweller said that grandma's ring, which is a row of five small diamonds, where the middle one has come out, would be no problem to fix and would cost £30. Next was my ring, first of all he said the claws were so worn down that I was extremely lucky that the diamond had not just fallen out and told me that to build them back up would cost - wait for it - £140!!! I don't know if I am incredibly naive but I can't believe that it costs so much just to put 6 claws back on a ring!!! Mark nearly had to pick me up off the floor in shock. The problem is, my engagement ring is very precious to me and so with my bank balance now £140 lighter I have left it at the jewellers and will collect it in 10 days time!
What judgment is coming to them for their great and mighty sins when Jesus who died for all men to be saved tells them Depart from me I never you. I was in prison I was sick and I was poor and you never lifted one finger to help me. When Lord when did we do this to you will these hypocrites ask him. They are so blind to their own sins that they do not even see they are the people Jesus referred to.
It would be interesting if anyone has any further insight into this part, or even wants to buy it so we can have a closer look!http://cgi.ebay.co.uk/Honda-F1-Front-hub-and-2x-2004-Honda-BBS-front-wheels-/220606901522?cmd=ViewItem&pt=UK_Sports_Memorabilia_ET&hash=item335d322d12
This is a very short read, and it did not engage me either for the characters, or their activity, or – come to that – what little plot it had. I didn’t find it erotic at all, though the plot had potential to be so.
White
Saturday morning at 5 a.m., the cat came back.
1.Directions for method 1: -mash 1 large banana and mix it with 1-11/2 Tablespoons of nut butter in a small container ( use either peanut butter, almond butter, cashew butter, etc.) This way is a little thicker , more like a spread.
Planners, researchers and their ilk love to take a little information and turn it into a heroic vision. Beware of this. Most valuable insights are small and contingent. There is almost nothing you can say about human behavior that is universal. Including this.
Although I am only beginning to explore these questions, I can hazard this much: terrorism is not their demon of choice. Rather, it is the rank stranger outside the gate. It is the black cloud of evil that can settle anywhere, anytime, in their fretful vision of modern America. It is the vile nature of strangers, of difference, of heathens, but also the evil within: what the pastor might do to the organist, what the children might allege in the nursery—and if they don’t fear these things, the marketing of sacred security explicitly tells them that they should. Thank God—or Gideon Protect Services, or Watchman Security, or Savior Protection, Inc.—that video surveillance cameras, properly installed, will protect the innocent and ward off the wicked. Such is the sales pitch from the companies that I have been researching in this complex economy of fear.
This realignment of forces was developed as a practical means of lessening the level of uncertainty and tension among Asia-Pacific nations that threatens economic growth and political development in the region. The plan also helps to strengthen the US-Japan defense alliance and opens the door for further integration of US and Japanese forces.
Glazed cherries- 1/2 cup, chopped
She pushed him away into the distance with his screams echoing and a dispirited expression on her face. The proper response to this was to take a sledgehammer to the television, but I imagine it didn't occur to her.
Fancy of Not
1 red pepper (I favour the sweet, pointed ones), finely chopped
Over the last couple of months, I find myself Facebook friends with a number of my Afircan American family members. Facebook certaintly can’t turn water into blood (although, I’m sure there will be a button for that one day), but it’s a start. My girlfriend and I even had the joy of recently visiting my cousin April’s house for the first time (no piggy back rides were allowed, though).
So for those of you who patiently listened to me whine about my leg for three weeks and swear that I had the beginnings of a stress fracture, I have an update. I took last week off except for the half marathon on Saturday. I cross-trained like a motha, but I did not run. Except once to the mailbox because I was excited to open it. Don't you feel that way about mail some days?
Get your whole family between the ages of nine and eighteen to vote? Get a whole family's worth of chances to win! And yes, if you already voted, that counts - just leave a comment.
I hate St. Patrick's Day. I was able to avoid all visual reminders today because I didn't leave the office at all. My lunch was delivered to me via SeamlessWeb.com by using their app on my iPhone. The only time I saw some dumb people wearing all green and wearing leprechaun flop hats was on the subway going home. And why is it always white people who get all greened up for this holiday? I was anticipating the worst tonight at Nurse Bettie and was probably a bit prickly when I got there. But pleasantly to my surprise, it was not douchey at all. Generally speaking, Nurse Bettie does not attract a fraternity crowd or a more "ghetto" crowd like The Delancey. But every now and then, you get that ONE stupid guy who is drunk and misbehaves, and I picked him out right off the bat! His friend was okay and acted like he was embarrassed by his friend's loudmouth, obnoxious behavior. During the dance-off game, the obnoxious one particularly threw himself on the stage without knowing what he was in for. Then he actually SLAPPED my butt!!! I was like, "Oh, no you didn't!!" I stopped explaining to the audience the rules of the game and said, "If you touch me again, I will kick you out of this bar." I felt like I had to say that so many times tonight! Sometimes doing a show at a bar environment is great fun cause its rowdy and wild, but the crowd management and reading the audience can piss me off really quick. So his poor friend did the dance off, and he was a good sport. But the obnoxious one refused to dance! I wanted to hang him by the balls on the hangers on the wall!!! Alex, the bartender that we all love, grandly stepped in and helped finish the game. The best part? When the judging time came, NO ONE clapped for the obnoxious guy's friend. It's not his fault but I think the audience was on my side and transferred their dislike to the other guy. Seriously. I even asked twice for their applause and I think a girl actually boo-ed. The rest of the show was grand. All the girls were great and really "brung" it as always.
We came back to the hostel to get ready for Queen’s day, the Dutch holiday celebrating their queen’s birthday. One might be thinking, .why are you celebrating a dutch holiday in Ecuador of all places?’ Well mon frier, there happens to be 6 Dutch people staying in the hostel. And even stranger is that they didn’t know each other until they came here.
With Xen-Tan, you're in complete control and the depth of colour is up to you. Simply apply a thin coat for a lighter tan, or apply a second layer for a deeper olive finish.
11-My girls are on their way to the next round of cheer competition again. They cleaned house again this year. If they make it through the next round they will go to Disney. Holy moly.
1 medium onion, chopped
Beneath my mask, I feel a bead of sweat form on my brow. This is the closest I’ve been to him since I threw him in jail. It would have been smarter to watch him from a distance and not allow him this kind of advantage.
I would like to go to a zoo. An aquarium. Horse farms, where I can learn more about horses.
"Thank you for shopping Art Chicago, the floor is now closed."
After the image has been captured by the sensor and converted into a digital form, basic image processing is done in the camera. This includes removing noise and grain inherent in the sensor, adjusting color levels to user taste, and other simple tasks that don’t require the power of a desktop computer. More modern DSLRs have more powerful computers that allow more complex in-camera processing like converting an image from color to black and white. After the processing is done, Presto! You have your final image.
I think it's fine and dandy there are wonderful books about boys. I think Kevin Brooks Black Rabbit Summer is fantastic in it's depiction of a very real teenage summer, full of honest, accurately scary nasty violence and raw emotion. There is also a lot of drinking and drug taking. I have no problem at all with this. I think it adds to the reality of the world of the book.
However, PETA as a barrier to animal rights is only one part of the cost to any viable abolition movement. The other part is the opportunity cost incurred by PETA. We should ask not only how PETA could remove itself as a barrier, but how much more PETA could do by being consistent with animal rights philosophy in their public education. What if PETA dropped the garbage – the single-issue campaigns, the welfare campaigns, the sexism – and engaged solely in creative, nonviolent vegan education? When we add the opportunity cost to the barrier cost, the total cost to progress in animal rights is enormous and tragic.
- tackling the Arthur C Clarke shortlist once it is announced on Friday 4th March
for snacks, he got dried, salty pigs' ears, and Milkbones, and horses hooves that i had to take away from him after a while because after he'd chewed on them the whole house smelled of blood.
Eventually I realised that even if in five years’ time I would be trying to present male, transition was what I wanted Now, and trying it was the only way to work out whether it was right for me. I thought about autogynephilia, and secondary transsexualism, and decided that of the two questions “Am I transsexual?” and “Should I transition?” the second was the most important, and Yes was the answer I wanted.
Soon enough there are disturbing reports from the Shinjuku district in the heart of downtown Tokyo. A poisonous gas has been detected and the authorities suspect a terrorist threat. Maki knows better. The One has returned. Maki takes off in pursuit and Sara follows. They encounter a strange bedraggled figure in the subterranean waterways below the city. Sara recognizes him as Udo, her former lover. He pleads with her to tell him what has become of him. Sara, clutching a gun containing darts filled with a poison she has designed to kill him, wants to trust him. But she has seen too much already. In the previous battle, Udo in his monstrous form had tried to kill her. She fires. But the tears welling in her eyes cause her to miss. It’s just what the monster hoped for, he transforms back into the alien beast and captures Sara. Unbeknownst to him though, she has one dart left and fires it at point blank range into his heart. But instead of dying, the monster grows enraged and escapes again.
With Secret Service protection awarded to visiting dignitaries, this also means, for instance, that the federal government could consider a demonstration against any foreign president on American soil as a violation of federal law, as long as it could be considered disruptive to whatever function is occurring.
“Whatever you’d like, dear,” she’d say, and then go right along with it.
(Moving down one spot) 3.) Gargoyles (Season 2, Vol. 2 and Season 3) – In 1994, the syndicated block of Disney animated shows known as “The Disney Afternoon” debuted a little known show entitled Gargoyles. It has gone on to be one of the biggest Disney cartoon shows ever produced with a fan base to rival most other fantasy/ sci fi shows. Disney released a few episodes on VHS back in the 90′s and then started releasing the full show in 2005, stopping at the first half of the second season. The second half of season two and The Goliath Chronicles, known by some simply as season three, have yet to be released despite the great demand for this show.
She paces the isle of the streets
The most noticeable change is the removal of the second staircase along the left side. We realized that we didn't need a designated staircase for going in and out of the backdoor from the garage. We decided to extend the main stair along the front to add more stairs and allow easier flow from the driveway to the backdoor. The angle of the newly added stairs follow the driveway so that the last step steps directly onto the drive.
“My ancestors settled in this area like more than a hundred years ago. Then they moved away up around New York somewhere. Just like Dee said, we had an argument between brothers and sisters, aunts and uncles, and people bailed on each other. But my mother said that almost immediately when I was born she felt this need to look up her ancestry. Like something was telling her to find her lost family and kiss and make up and all that. When she found them in this area, she wanted to move back right away. It was like some kind of tribute to her relatives or something. But I didn’t know what the real connection was until I went through my grandfather’s will.”
I won’t detail the pre-order fiasco that resulted in my waiting over a year for the complete list of promised items (several not arriving as promised) again; I covered it in a previous blog entry. But things took a decided downturn at that moment. Even as Amanda herself confessed in a blog posting that friends had cautioned her about her suddenly prolific webcam auctions and bragging about the money made (in the midst of endless travelling and endlessly disappointing those who supported the album at its start-up, like myself), she justified herself. You see, anyone with a problem was not a visionary, as she was. Amanda took to skewing the true issues people had with the scenario (auctioning her fiance, Neil Gaiman’s daughter on a date with two strangers, was just… creepy; traveling the globe but then seemingly begging for back-owed rent seemed tasteless and irresponsible) and made it a manifesto on how artists were entitled to “put out their hats for donations.” While I don’t disagree with this concept at all, and firmly prefer to pay artists as directly as possible for their art, if I have to skip travel to see family in Europe to make rent, why should an artist be different?
Asked about the development, Amit Khanna, chairman, Reliance Big Entertainment that runs Big Cinemas and Big Pictures among other film-related businesses, said: “We are all working towards an early resolution and I am hopeful that we will be able to resolve the matter very soon.” Khanna, however, said no solution had been reached yet.
Supplies used: cardstock - white; patterned papers - First Date, Lucky Laugh, Pretty Please all in Neopolitan by American Crafts; Buttons - my stash; rhinestones - Bazzil; sentiment stamp from Wimsical Fun - Vol 1 by Whimsical Designs; Once Upon A Princess Cricut cartridge.
As we reported earlier, Se7en’s new album will be a collaboration between JYP and Se7en. Teasers were shown showing JYP playing the piano, then being joined by Se7en. Se7en also released the new mini album tracklist. This is the first time that JYP Entertainment and YG Entertainment will be working together.
Aside from the mixology portion (where I should note, I got a 99. One point off for filling a martini too full. Seriously? Any real customer would give me extra credit for that.), we learned tons about how practically every spirit is made and consumed.
750-ml bottles should be available before the end of the year.
“Prove this whole trickle-down theory to me,” I taunted. “How rising tides raise all boats.” That brought forth a litany of indignation, mostly in two forms. One, things were much better now than they were 100 years ago, owing to the miracle of free market capitalism. OK, sure. But my line of attack wasn’t necessarily directed at the idea of free market capitalism, only how it’s been conducted in the last 30 years or so. Cast your minds back, 50, 60 years ago, to the more immediate post-War era. Where governments taxed the richest of the rich more prodigiously and spent massively on things like infrastructure, established universal health care and sent men to the moon. An era when a single bread winner could buy a house, raise a family, put the kids through college and retire comfortably.
"Ham and Eggs, privates in an all-black regiment, become buddies in training camp and are stationed together in a small French Village....Friml, an enemy spy...has Fifi, his Negro waitress, flirt with the soldiers to get...information...(T)he pair are sent to the front...they are accidentally cast adrift in a balloon, and in parachuting to safety, they 'capture' Friml. They are later decorated for their bravery."
This weekend I decided to tackle a few much needed projects inside my house. The weather was finally cold so being outside was not in the program for me. I have many grand plans for work that I would like to accomplish in my home but this weekend was going to include a few simple electrical projects. Of course, as these tasks usually go for me, this one simple item turned into much more of a production than I expected.
So, I ordered a cafe doble and I saw a display of beautiful muffins when we walked in. On the menu it listed "Muffin" along with the available flavors. One of which was arandano, or blueberry, which is my favorite. So I ordered a muffin de arandano.
Show Brochure; 3)
I went online and found a video interview with Louie about his plans. One of the things I’ve always appreciated about Louie is his readiness to listen to the Lord’s leading and do something totally different. Most of the times “totally different” for Louie seems to require bigger faith and bigger risks for God’s glory. But Louie always takes them and never looks back. I pray this new venture will be more God-exalting than anything that has come before. There’s something very cool about the ultimate “conference guy” becoming the pastor of a local church.I’ll be praying for you, Louie.
confirmation update #4: Yesterday (4/24/2012) — I was not available to watch events unfold , but saw quickly, when I looked on intellicast, multiple detections of hail over central south New Mexico heading towards El Paso, TX .
We are sad that we could only spend such a short time with you, but we are so glad and thankful for every minute of it.
While prostasin should not be used as the only blood test for ovarian cancer, assessment of prostasin levels together with CA125 levels improves the likelihood of early detection. Ultrasound is almost always used to check the size of the ovaries.
And bought my first Dragonflys. For 100 pesos.
May you have faith, and
Tardon has been an elite warrior, one of the best, the strongest, the bloodthirstiest for many years. It becomes his responsibility to train Arianna, then to provide the test for the Elders to either pass or fail the first female warrior. But, could his judgement be skewed? Is she really worthy to become an elite warrior? The Elders have little use for the female warrior. But, when the cursed breach the walls of the castle, she is called upon with the others to save their kingdom.
I’m guessing that like most primulas, it would tolerate considerably more shade.
These playoffs will be fun. There may be one or two “cakewalks” in the first round, but don’t be surprised if they turn into series, as well. This condensed schedule has made some of the older guys legs tired as they entire into the second season. Fortunately they’ll get more rest and practice time this time of the year than they have all season. It should be good.
So yesterday I got back from a trip full of delays, which left me super tired and cranky. But I got home and found out I got awarded part-time! I am so incredibly happy, it was like Christmas! I have been waiting for this for 7 months. It has been so hard being away from my kids and Emery for so many days a month, but now I will be home so much more. I can still pick up trips if we need extra money. Honestly, I don't ever see myself leaving this job now that I am part-time. Now I can have that perfect work-home balance that I wanted so badly and I am so grateful.
1 bulb fennel cored and thinly sliced
Then, to top it all off, just spend an entire minute with a grieving parent who has just been informed that their school-aged child… has just died surprisingly, like in a traffic collision in which the child flew out of the passenger seat right into the path of the school bus that you were driving. Oh, and, if you are really open to experiencing heart-opening gratitude for the fragility of life, be the one to tell them the news.
Glaucoma can be prevented by having regular eye check-ups. Immediately consult your eye doctor/ophthalmologist if you have blurry vision or if you have eye pain. . Stop taking your eyesight for granted and include it as part of your annual check up. Always ask for an eye pressure check up too.
Those exceptions aside, the basic selection bias principle at work is clear: if you think Jesus was a well-meaning legend, you’re not likely to spend the time and money getting the sort of credentials that will let you in to Habermas’s study. A powerful example of this selection bias at work is the exclusion of Earl Doherty, whom Carrier described as “one of the most expert amateurs I have ever encountered.” But Doherty — who only has undergraduate degrees in History and Classical Languages, not Ph.Ds — doesn’t qualify as a biblical scholar, and so he’s out.
Horse Sense game
painting with the bars new name, La Cuevita.
We were up and out early the next day and man, was it cold! Athletica always told me she did better in the cold than the hotter weather. I’ve only raced in the heat it seems so didn’t know the difference. Her race was first. She did the half marathon. I did the 5K. I ran in a crowd of tutu’d women and a man with a giant fake moustache. People were pumped and their energy was infectious. What was really cool were the number of kids running. Dads with their young sons and daughters were clearly at the head of the pack. With the obesity problem for so many kiddos these days it was nice to see this. Even the announcer brought it up before the race.
University of Maryland, talks about the future of HCI in his keynote “Technology-Mediated Social Participation: The Next 25 Years of HCI Challenges”
In court.
Bright-eyed and bushy-tailed, I sat myself down in the first class with my pristine notepad in one hand and my Erma Bombeck commemorative pen in the other. One hour later my paper was filled with scribbles and my writing hand was cramping. Class after class I struggled to keep up, but the speakers had a common theme. Commit to your Platform and Brand.
When that day comes I will happily usher you into the cave, beg you to sleepover and make everyone fry-ups for breakfast... But until I am in better humor, best stick to the safe subjects - Oh You like my cave? It's just been redecorated, you know! (Sorta thing)
3: Crazy On You
Also included is the OVA episode that acts as the perfect epilogue to the final episode and although it doesn’t really add to the story it is fun to see Ichika and the girls together again. Even better, however, we finally get to see Ichika and Houki alone at last. Well, sort of but it makes for a great ending scene. On top of that, this Complete Collection set includes a number of awesome extras as well.
Click here to read more about the National Council on Aging and its efforts. While you are on the site, make sure to look at benefits check up to learn about federal, state, and local programs for yourself, or someone who you care about.
I feel like so often, hair does not turn out how you want it when you do a hair trial and it could stress you out even more. My lady was AMAZING!! I absolutely LOVED my hair.
--Losing a parent
Only time will tell. Loyalty vs all them dollars! Ummm Hmmm!
Pinterest is great for so many things. I am not very organized so I find it fabulous for filing away creative ideas. I have made a few recipes from the foods I’ve pinned. Many were good and some were terrible. I wanted to pass on this one that’s a tried & true keeper. I like it because I don’t have to turn on the oven, the kids can actually help with them and despite their sweet taste, you sneak in a 1/2 cup of ground flax seed for fiber, vitamins, protein and omega-3s. Make sure to buy ground flax seed or grind yourself at home for the full benefits and store in the refrigerator to keep it from going rancid.
Mr. Digby made a careful scrutiny of the two, as they lay before him on the table. The Evans proof was darker than his own – the picture obviously wanted cleaning – and the photograph, as a photograph, was a poor one, only faintly indicating the cloak that covered the chair in the right-hand corner. Apart from that there seemed to be no difference between the two.
Work…
Current Yield since inception: +66.42%
I prefer relaxing holiday as I feel our trip was quite rush but we don't have a month or 2 months to spend in Europe so I guess it is still better than tour group holiday...
And it was the petrified face of a newly divorced 35 year old, wondering what in the hell she was supposed to do with her life now...............
In this case, the Patent Office’s interpretation of "original application" does not effect any change in existing law or policy; rather, it is a prospective clarification of ambiguous statutory language regarding a matter of procedure. It is therefore "interpretive"- rather than "substantive" . . . Because the Patent Office is specifically charged with administering statutory provisions relating to "the conduct of proceedings in the Office," 35 U.S.C. § 2(a)(2)(A), we give Chevron deference to its interpretations of those provisions. Under the two-step Chevron analysis, the reviewing court (1) must "always first determine ‘whether Congress has directly spoken to the precise question at issue.’" When a phrase is not a defined term in a statute, and when the statutory context does not provide any "concrete indication of Congress’s intended meaning," the reviewing court (2) examines "whether, in its own interpretation of its responsibilities under the Act, the agency charged with the everyday administration of the provision applies ‘a permissible construction.’"
The holiday season is the worse! And quite frankly I’m glad it’s now behind us. Especially with family distant… not so much in proximity… but distant nevertheless. The rainy Seattle winters don’t make it any easier. I can’t wait ’til springtime! Always for me my favorite time of the year Spring embodies thoughts of renewal and bright sunshiny days ahead (even here on occasion in Seattle). I’m grateful I have a few friends to share and enjoy those days of renewal with.
So I'm going to blog about something that drives me crazy in a funny/weird way about Mr.Curious...and I'm not sure if all guys do this or not........but sometimes I just want to scream when he does.
Dark bronze color. Bitter taste, but pretty plain otherwise. I get a light toast and cinnamon on the next few sips. Aftertaste is still bitter. Medium carbonation. 2 Stars.
The NLRB agreed last week to postpone the effective date of the employee rights notice posting after a federal court in Washington, D.C., requested that the board hold off until after a hearing of a legal challenge of the rule.
The sales area had some wonderful rebar trellises including this fan shaped one. As some of my friends know, my former co-gardener made exceptional rebar garden art. I wish I had taken up on his offer to teach me to weld with his oxygen and acetylene (??) torch but I was kinda scared of it. Kaboom!
We took Jackson out in the snow for the first time today! He seemed to like it. He had a hard time walking in his snow boots. I'm excited to take him sledding soon!
A couple of points to get out of the way before I go.
This was a very competitive area this year, which shows just how burgeoning the genre on to itself has become. Not only are established authors venturing into the Steampunk fold, but many new voices are finding homes there. In the end I went for the fun factor as the decider here, which The Strange Affair of Spring Heeled Jack oozes. Priest's latest Clockwork Century novel took a bit to get going, but once it did not even a 10 ton locomotive engine couldn't have stopped it and we get more closure on some of the characters we loved from Boneshaker. But with the Steampunk we've also seen the resurgence of Weird West. The Half-Made World was about as surreal a world as you'll likely fine with Gilman giving us a Western like no other before in a world that is still settling into reality. The VanderMeer's second Steampunk anthology is much stronger with the first for it gives us many more examples of the styles that exist in the genre while also giving a good world view of the movement beyond the literary.
But, I missed chronicling our life and house projects, and I missed you, my blog friends. So, here I am. Truth be told, I actually had many people asked why I stopped blogging. The idea that people actually read this and wanted me to continue was a very happy surprise.
I slacked around for about 8 months and then I became self-employed. My great ploy to postpone the daily 9-to-5 routine of a regular work life.
5. The first time I realized that there is wildlife right in our own neighborhoods was around the age of 10 when I lived in a suburb of Toronto, Canada. I was walking home from school one day when I spied a snowy owl sitting on the roof of the house at the top of the street on which I lived. Neighborhood kids were congregating and cameras were out. I ran home to get my mother’s camera and quickly clicked through the remainder of the roll. I think my fascination with wildlife kicked into high gear that day. Since then I have seen deer in the front yard of the house on Bainbridge Island near Seattle where I stayed during a summer in college while doing a ministry internship. The school at which I teach is in the heart of Memphis, but we have a red-tailed hawk that lives in a large tree just south of our football field. I have seen that same hawk swoop down into the courtyard of our school looking for chipmunks. A year ago we had a mother fox who made a den near the creek that runs in front of our school and she had two pups. They have since pressed on. A month ago I was sitting in my car in the parking lot of an apartment complex in Little Rock when I looked out my side window to see a darkly colored hawk, maybe a Coopers Hawk, sitting twenty feet away on the wrought iron fence. These encounters remind me that they were here before we were.
appear human
See you, folks, till next time. This is Grass signing out.
This is the “golden goose” this doe is displaying full estrus and is excepting bucks. Undoubtedly she is be followed by a buck . And most likely if the first buck that passes by and it’s a dink, eventually another buck will pass hot on their trail.
The access road to one of the camps, Hilaweyn, has been flooded. This has slowed down the delivery of services, including water provision. UNHCR has met partners to work on rehabilitating the road and maintaining access to the camp. Dollo Ado’s dry-weather airstrip was closed for most of last week, but is currently serviceable. Road convoys are in place during the rainy season, to supplement or replace air travel as necessary.
Here at the start of another year, I am sure we all have some goals in mind. One of mine is to deepen my prayer life. To that end, I'm going to be adding some pages to my prayer journal in the "Adoration" section -- pages dealing with spiritual blessings God gives us as His children. As I thought about this, and as I had my prayer time this morning, I was struck by the thought of what a blessing my prayer journal is to me, and how it has revitalized my prayer life over the years I've been using it and adding to it. I am quite sure that if our house caught fire, I would run for my prayer journal before grabbing anything else!
So, today’s topic is about how late into pregnancy you can continue exercising. This is a question I often get asked from my pregnant clients who attend my pregnancy fitness and/or Pilates classes.
Warm up those vocal chords and be prepared to sing! Now hop on over to
The idea is to get you some really great gifts for Valentines Day!!
I wonder if those aboard flight 1549 have found the same peace.
Please display this badge proudly and link it to the Digi's With Attitude! Challenge Blog. To qualify for the $5.00 Digi's With Attitude! Store Gift Certificate please read the guidelines here
Education, health and social services shall be the basic pillars for building society, and the state shall work on achieving balanced development among all regions of the Syrian Arab Republic.
Our Lady and St Gregory?”
04. SUPER DUPER GALAXY
Than Trees, or Flint? O force of constant Woe!
The blind man took a step back from the sounds,
This is a question which we can never really know the answer too, because we cannot read the minds of believers, but we can take a pretty good guess. I think that the reason why most believers believe is because it gives them some sort of personal victory, it makes them feel like part of the ‘in’ crowd. To any conspiracy there are three groups of people. Those behind the conspiracies, who are the most evil people on earth, are incredibly powerful and intelligent, but occasionally very, very stupid.
1216 D-VII/9/1995. “For Myrtle Todes, On Her Ninetieth Birthday.” East Bank Club, Chicago, Illinois.
*We have 4 more payments to my parents for some money they loaned us and then we will be done paying off all our debts (other than the house).
At a school recently I spoke to an audience of 14 year olds. I asked the question,’who here is a scientist’. Note this is after I have explained what a scientist is in simple terms – someone able to question, to make judgements, to experiment to search for the truth. Out of a group of sixty, five hands went up (two of those were teachers). I’d already warmed them up so I knew they were capable and confident in raising their arms to earlier questions.
First off, the up & downs of the stock market are essentially meaningless. Unlike the current Washington baboons who fixate on Wall Street, we’re gonna ignore it. Sure, the stock market is essential in providing investment money for business. But mostly it’s just a pack of gamblers who bet on the success of other people’s businesses. Many now bet on the success or failure of the other broker’s bets. Heck, we’d do no worse aligning our economy to a Vegas sports book.
The clips seem almost Celtic pagan in their design, as if someone just dug them up from a bog or burial site. They look great next to white paper, and there are two colors in the box of 50: regular copper color and a darker grayish color that looks a tad like pewter. Stylish, decidedly different, and fun as well--these will add some interest to my paperwork in the future.
I’m the coffee instead
Looking west down the street:
Off we rushed. Here are some of my goodies all bound for the Topsham Vintage and handmade fair along with the stools and a few other pieces I have "reloved".
Boy and girl have been together for 6 years.
MSRP: $69.99 US
Also...what's this about the universe being littered with tiny 'loops, bubbles and wormholes'? I had no idea. I imagine them appearing and disappearing again like those tiny cirrus clouds high up in the sky on a fine day. The more I found out about 'stuff', the more perplexing it all seems to be...
The old woman sighs heavily, and gathering the rosary from her lap chants in monotone voice: “HAIL, HOLY QUEEN, Mother of Mercy, our life, our sweetness and our hope! To thee do we cry, poor banished children of Eve; to thee do we send up our sighs, mourning and weeping in this valley of tears. Turn then, most gracious advocate, thine eyes of mercy toward us, and after this our exile, show unto us the blessed fruit of thy womb, Jesus. ”
So I've gone to the opposite extreme. I am sure the people passing my car expect to see an ancient driver who is a veteran of the Civil War, but much to their surprise, they are met with an aging red haired tattooed goth girl singing Duran Duran to her two kids in the back seat.
I was reading my blogging friend Camille's blog, The Vintique Object, and saw a photo of her bathroom with this fabulous rug in it! She too is a fellow renter trying to spruce up her place within the constraints of renting.
(‘God bless you,’ you said to me).
Wi' tippenny (Two penny), we fear nae evil;
I started out as a lurker, but quickly became a subscriber, and the 20 or so gorgeous kits that I received in the coming months were by far some of the best scrappy packages ever! The inspiration that I gained from the design team along the way played a huge part in my creative growth.
A couple of years ago, the Good Pub Guide attracted a lot of criticism for its plan to charge pubs £199 a year for a full entry in the publication. This raises the question of how much extra business an entry in a guidebook actually brings in for a pub. While it does include other types of pub, the GPG very much majors on the middle-class rural dining pub where you’ll get a nice braised lamb shank with redcurrant jus and coriander mash. If you run that type of pub, especially in a touristy area, you’ll probably attract a lot of trade from featuring in the book, so your outlay is likely to be well worthwhile.
Brown crushed noodles and almonds in butter. In the last couple of minutes add the sesame seeds and brown without burning. Drain on paper towels and cook to room temperature. Reserve until ready to serve salad.
Lord Hastings raised his brows in question and sipped lazily from the snifter he held in his hand.
1934-36 Batter-Up #139 Bill Jurges
Therapist: Enter, not delete.
* For the over 50 or you know what I’m talking about crowd- The guy dresses like a captain, the woman wears chenille. “The Captain and Chenille.”
scratching at granite prisons
Date: September 27, 2010
Stay tuned . . . . . .
You feel jarred. In the grocery store. At a birthday party. At the dinner table. At Christmas. Driving.
And finally, perhaps the best result of the whole endeavour, was one of my favourite stories, (10) Just Jeff, getting published at Every Day Fiction. It's had, generally, a pretty good response from the readers, and I'm very happy to know it's "out there" at last.
Because I've been making a lot of pizzas, I've also been playing around with topping ingredients. Straying from the typical red sauce. I've used olive oil, ranch dressing, alfredo - and of course, pesto. I love the garlicy-ness of pesto so I paired it with some mild flavors, grilled chicken and roasted red pepper. Top with some fresh mozzarella and you've got a winning pizza.
I realize that I've skipped a few days. So, I am a bit behind the challenge, but that's ok. I'll throw out the Saturday, Sunday and Mondays challenges today.
Spread the brownie batter in a lightly greased 8×8 inch baking pan.
If we have ever had the opportunity to say. “Money does not grow on trees”. We know that we have had good reason to think the thought or say the saying. Afterall, we have all probably heard that statement at least once in our life-time right? Consider running with that thought in a creative direction. Make a custom gift that you can place meaning behind and invite others to contribute, saving even more.
He came to Jesus at night and said, “Rabbi, we know you are a teacher who has come from God. For no one could perform the miraculous signs you are doing if God were not with him.” In reply Jesus declared, “I tell you the truth, no one can see the kingdom of God unless he is born again.” (John 3:2-3)
Believe me, I totally understand that many people just do not have the leeway for a garden full of plants bolting to seed as it would take up the entire garden area leaving no room at all for the real food crops. We are very fortunate to have enough extra ground for these projects and this post is simply an expression of my thoughts on what we will be working towards going forward as it relates to the saving of our own seed. Besides, it is very empowering, empowerment that is created by knowing that one can depend upon him or herself for their own food. As they say "He who controls the seed also controls the feed."
“Allow the Word of Christ to dwell in each one of you richly as you teach and admonish one another in all wisdom, singing and making melody in your hearts to the Lord.” Paul of Tarsus, Colossians 3:16
And I don't feel lightheaded.
The point is that the leap from these films to House Of The Devil is an astonishing one. Not the work of a different filmmaker but one coming fully into his own. Any hint of the amateurishness that haunted West’s previous work is gone. House is a work of almost painful control.
Hope you like it
Iván Meade - What is the inspiration behind the 28 Series light fixtures and what was the process?
From the time I had stepped into his taxi, a Premier Padmini 1992 Model, the Maharashtrian taxi driver, originally from Kolhapur, quickly spelt out his stand on the rule. “If the taxi is functioning well and also now that almost all of them have converted to CNG, why should they be banned from the roads?” A rolled-up copy of Maharashtra Times lay wedged between the rearview mirror and the roof.
This second Bond film from 1963 is another fun, tongue in cheek spy movie based on the fifth Bond novel from Ian Fleming, who was, himself, an elite MI-6 agent during WWII. If you are looking for a serious espionage drama this isn’t it. If you want a little relaxing humor and some cool action scenes, have at it.
The last book, which I finished this morning, is a superior detective novel set in Lower Manhattan, Lush Life by Richard Price. It's partly a collection of observations from New York life and acute character sketches, and partly a traditional police procedural written with a keen sense of empathy. It's about wasted dreams and wasted lives, as in some way the other two books also are; apart from that they have nothing else in common except the city where they're set.
There is an intuitive logic to this question of familiarity which says the sooner a child gets familiar with this alien world and the sooner she can start functioning within it, the more opportunities she will have to gain whatever benefits are possible. The implication of this logic is that, on average, children who attend preschool should have some continuing developmental advances over those who do not. But does it really work this way? Are the cognitive and social development of children essentially a process of linear accumulation? Does it matter whether Pip and Polly get institutionalized as three-year-olds instead of five-year-olds?
Over the past month, there has been considerable debate about the current state and future of the publishing industry across the internet on writer’s forums and blogsites. Some of the discussion was sparked by Boris Kachka’s recent article in the New York Magazine.
Looking back on the year that has come and gone in what feels like the blink of an eye and much more than a year simultaneously, I'm floored by all the ups and downs. It's weird to look back at the beginning of 2010, which was a pretty all-around awful time for me. The first two-thirds of the year, really, were nothing to speak highly of emotionally. It makes me feel good to see that I came around that and have finally arrived back, I think, at who I really am. And now I get to ponder stuff like this by myself for a few days on planes. Woooooooo!
Clearly, this parent has no clue what she's doing. She should've taught the kids to run faster.
5-6 large dried anchovies
with my head on his shoulder
· A pint of Guinness takes awhile to be poured properly--if you're in a hurry then order something else.
(c) Copyright Page Bryant, 2006 & 2011. All Rights Reserved.
Public transport has it's place, but I love my car.
generous pinch thyme, pepper and rosemary
But the story must be finished. Just edits and rewrites to go. Brenda allows one more day of edits to make it better–and to pare the entry down to just 250 words–that’s where your ‘Voice’ comes in–your own unique way of hooking your reader, first off. Then it’s all up to the agenting skills of Natalie Fischer–her critiques being first, second and third prizes!
Bazzill CS, Luxe Ornate Frame Transparency, Prima Bling and Flowers, Tim Holtz, Technique Tuesday, MME Stamps, MM Brad, Memento and Distress Ink, Zing Black Glitter embossing powder, Ribbon from Prima or AC?
The communication skills and ethics station aims to assess the candidate’s ability to guide and organise the interview with the subject (who may be a patient, relative, or surrogate, such as a health care worker), explain clinical information, apply clinical knowledge, including knowledge of ethics, to the management of the case or situation, provide emotional support and treat the patient with dignity and respect.
'Oh no!' Thought Moon.
The new location, at Place Fontainas #8, is a ten minute walk
I realized there would be no more shared ice cream with Daddy...
in the presence of her gentle rest
Please note: Following Small Review will never be a requirement for entry. I will not host giveaways where entrants are required to "like," follow, tweet, or make any other endorsements. Extra entries will not be given at this time.
What did we learn from all of this? Money has a way of dictating how people relate to each other. It also has a way of dictating how we relate to personal ability. Dave and I could have been ATM machines, the way we seemed to constantly engage via financial transactions: insert logic, expel cash. We didn't just do it to each other though, we did it within ourselves. How could we truly relate to our logic when it's all based around financial transactions?
Isabella’s character was fun and adventurous just the opposite of Fallon.
My own duty is that I pray for my partners everyday; not once a month but everyday. And I promise you, my God who had been faithful to me all these years will be faithful to my partners also in Jesus’ name.
So thinking of the past can give both pleasant, humorous, sad, embarrassing and shameful memories. for example over the last 8 months i have been living far away from family and friends in Sydney and its pushed me through my last stages of choosing the self persecuting choices which led me astray towards a chaotic bipolar day to day living into this sense of independence and living happily content. It was during this time of chaos that my blog was practically a husk of what it used to be, and only written when I was on the happy side of this chaotic bipolar little slice of hell. To put it simply it was a series, well pretty much a pattern of “happy-disappointment-angry-upset-break up-apologies-false sense of happiness” for about 6 months. Yes if you’ve gathered so far I’m talking about my previous relationship, and now your probably thinking “why didn’t you end it sooner if you were so unhappy then?” well it wasn’t as easy that, I was both in denial and holding onto that last slither of hope that things would change, I’m not saying I wasn’t happy at all in this 6 month duration, but it was quenched and like a candle in the rain, it didn’t take long to go out.
2. Low Fat Fakers – We often see food labels touting “low fat” or “reduced fat,” but even when these labels are true, they can be deceptive. Read the label carefully. Oftentimes, low fat “diet foods”are high in sugar, making them counterproductive for weight loss. Also, keep in mind there are good fats and bad fats. Good fats, like in some oils, avocado and nuts, are part of a healthy diet.
Country Inn Resort in Corbett- One of the luxurious and eco-friendly resorts of Jim Corbett National Park. Country Inn hotels and resorts combine luxury, comfort and beauty to create spaces uniquely meant for you and your family.
...This round of discussions about parking minimums hasn't reached Community Board 2 yet, said District Manager Robert Perris, but he knows it's been tried before. "I know the Downtown Brooklyn Partnership, on behalf of certain developments, and the Brooklyner was one of them, went to DCP and said these figures are crazy here," recalled Perris. "They were not successful in those negotiations." The Partnership refused to comment for this story.They were also crazy when it comes to Atlantic Yards, adjacent to Downtown Brooklyn (or, if you believe the developer, part of it) and adjacent to a major transit hub, as I wrote in December 2007, calling it PlaNYC 1950.
1 1/4 cups flour
You can read more about EB athttp://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Epidermolysis_bullosa His form of EB is Dystrophic epidermolysis bullosa (DEB) Online support groups are available!
“Pretty much, he has tripled everybody's business,” Ben said.
Hello. Hope you are well.
Our first Unschooling Conference salon is tomorrow. I am curious to hear what people have to say. I am excited and nervous about my presentations.
Well, I'll tell ya' -
Uh, I guess I could do a little research. Apparently, Bea Amblard is a "Hermès artisan designing under her own label" and a total bigshot. But still. $16,000 is a lot of money. If I'm going to spend that kind of money on a handbag, it had better be lined with $100 bills and gold teeth.
It is the depths of an abyss
Application Desk (several positions)
You may have already noticed that a lot of my clothes come from Ann Taylor Loft, Talbot's, and Eddie Bauer. That is because, like many retailers, most plus size clothing comes in synthetic fibers, and I Don't Wear Synthetics. I will wear rayon/viscose, because it breathes. But if I wanted to wrap my body in a trash bag and be 10,000 degrees all day, well, I could do that a whole lot cheaper than your $50 polyester/nylon travesty of a shirt.
And then he burned a disc.
So Bill was also very artistic. Literally, that is what he did, art. He worked in certain trades for money--wood working, painting, etc.--but was primarily an artist. And, as I would learn from conversations I was probably not supposed to hear, a raging alcoholic. However, this particular time of year he happened to have been sober for a while, and the 4th of July cook-out was at his house. Everyone was happy for Bill and his new-found sobriety, so this was a show of love and support for him. We had never previously held any kind of family function at his house. He had a cool little place on a lake with a big yard that went right down to the water. There were the usual picnic tables and grills and all of that. I would estimate, from very vivid memories, that there were about 30 people there. I have a big family, and at that time, everyone was pretty much living within 100 miles of each other.
Kozirev’s ether, the clockwise torsion of Galactic Center, is not only creating a beckoning Stargate, but it is altering our physical bodies to absorb energy from this photon source, while the combined forces of ancient mythical, spiritual and New Age disciplines alter our minds. We are being prepared, whether we like it or not, for our move from the mundane to the celestial.
"We live by 'the only thing we know is that we know nothing' here, Van Raighan. It comes with the territory."
I did machine quilt it but just the around the blocks. I didn't quilt any of the detail. It most likely has a polyester batting since that is all I used to use. It's still one of my most often used battings since I hand quilt.
Nick and I had a "discussion" right before bed last night
I know, you all just went out and bought your kids, your cousins, whatever, the game. And now you’re wondering how I figure it’s about animal abuse. Well, since I know far too much about it for someone who also has to pay bills, I’ll break it down for you.
in the churning turmoil of these taxes
Serve with salad and bread- yum!
The barrage will form a gateway feature for the valley, where redevelopment will be encouraged by the constant high water level, while maintaining the tidal environment in the section of the Ouseburn within the Newcastle Quayside redevelopment area.
4And the smoke of the incense, which came with the prayers of the saints, ascended up before God out of the angel’s hand.
Working with my needles, threads and vintage fabric is a good thing for me to get away from the harsh reality. This time it had to be the Suffolk Puffs. Some of you might have noticed the wonderful Yoyo (or Suffolk Puffs) quilt made of the most delicate 1920s fabrics. I truely adored that treasure and after carefully washing it, Jane and I perpetuated it in the photo for our Homespun Fair in August. But I couldn't keep it in that state. There were some rows missing and the backing fabric was very fragile and in some places already torn. So, with a heavy heart, I had to take it apart. Please don't beat me for it!
This has been a crucial factor in choosing how I look. I don't want to pick a constant battle against the forces of time.You cannot win, and I am someone who picks my battles very carefully. I choose not to compete in an area where I don't feel certain I will come out on top --- the arena of looking young and beautiful. Instead, I choose to channel my energy into other areas of my life --- work, sex, friendship, and love.
Flung their smoke into the laquearia,
Treasures by Shabby Chic will air Wednesday from 1 a.m. to 2 a.m. and 10 a.m. to 11 a.m.
And there was always snow at Christmas. Always. The snow gods smiled at us then. Here's hoping they smile so again.
Savage Garden was established in 2007 and has continued to thrive despite the bad real life economy. The full region sim is free to the public, all we ask is for a kind donation in anyone of the many donation boxes around the sim and don’t forget to join our Savage Garden VIP group so we can send you updates and it also gives you free access to special places only for group members. There is no charge to join the group.
Either way, at 62 years old, "The Professor" has passed away...
I said that – it may end up being you favorite part and I would not want to influence you! This time you should work with the right side of the fabric facing you. Encase the raw edge of your fabric with the thinner edge on the top and pin in place.
Shetlands also becomes the Shutland Islands and the lowlands at the Loanlands.
We both spotted the mother and calf right whales by their classic floating black "tabletop" appearance that just broke the surface of the water. While the whales stayed in the general area during the next two hours of our watch they weren't very active. However we did see the calf separate briefly from the mom and then rejoin her. There were fishing boats to either side of them and sometimes at very close range which made us wonder if this was what kept the whales under for longer periods of time.
Deciding on the marketing strategy
“She will now, after what you’ve done. Why couldn’t you just leave well alone? Why couldn’t you at least have talked to us before you did what you did?” She made a conscious effort to lean back in the chair, so as not to seem accusing, but her voice communicated what her body did not, and the words were spat out as if their taste was repulsive. “What should happen now is that she comes home and some excuse is made up as to why Auntie Hayley spirited her away for an adventure. But, no, that isn’t what you want is it? You want to change the course of history; you want to never have given her up in the first place.”
"We have both always wanted to see the Great Wall of China and Colin would love to stand at the foot of Ayres Rock in Australia," said Chris.
The next booth that caught my eye was the Fresh Oyster booth. I think I trampled over a few people as I made a bee line for the oysters. I love oysters. My father and I once sat down and finished 100 oysters each in one sitting in Knysna. It was a great day and one of my most favorite memories of my Dad.
Budweiser is trying to get into the "craft brew" market, and have failed. I was excited to give this a try, hoping the American brewing giant would come up with something good. There really is nothing good to say about the beer at all. It was a pathetic attempt at something they are not suited for. You can't just take Bud Light and make it an reddish amber color and then say you did something different.
one thing i do understand is that sending out our christmas cards would be much further along if i had such beautiful handwriting. excuses, excuses :).
six eggs. Never five or seven,
Thomas (As in thomas the train)
If any of you have experience brewing saisons and/or souring them, I'd love to hear your opinions on recipes, techniques, and the whole bit. I figure this will be a nice change of pace from my usual English-beer stuff and give me a chance to play around with sours - other than my usual batches of Berliner Weisses and hodge-podge sour dregs sours. Should be interesting!
So what else can you do with 6 lbs of chicken? Well, hopefully when you ate it (and not all of the chicken), you saved the bones. I should have mentioned, the 6 lbs of chicken meat was meant for only 2 people, and made to stretch of dinner that night, chicken chunks for butternut squash soup and more chicken for Part 4!
Tools: wine crate, paint, sponge brush and bowl of water.
Ereshkigal was still filled with rage when I was summoned to the discussion room. This room is barren aside from a table. I assume that they keep the table in there so that they are able to pound their fists into it or lean menacingly on it, as Ereshkigal was doing when I entered the room. Four faces turned to me. I have learned their names.
*One alternative is to melt white chocolate or milk chocolate and dip set caramel pretzels into the chocolate for a double layer of yummieness!
Friday, February 23rd–I watched a restoration of “Becket.”
I finally finished up this one today from a visit to Heinz Field on Super Bowl weekend. I went with my sister and my niece just to check it out since we were already in Pittsburgh babysitting my hubby's cousin's son.
For me, November is National Novel Writing Month and Nanowrimo with its challenge to write a 50,000 word novel in 30 days. I'm an avid reader, always have been. Give me a choice between watching tv and reading a book, I'll take reading any day. And of course, I've always thought it would be great fun to write my own story. So for the past two years, I've put aside both books and tv during the month of November to try and do just that.
Neither the genre of porn nor the names of the actor(s)/actress(es)/model(s) contained therein were listed.
How important is it to develop yourself? Well… Let’s put it this way. There are two sides where you can develop yourself. One is called a Negative Development the other is Positive Development. In order to make progress you first have to choose which side do you want to be on? Some people choose to be on a Negative Development side of town. They have heard how good it feels to use cocaine and they found it in their desire to try it out and feel what someone else feels using it. They’ve heard how great of an opportunity they have to steal some money from someone. They’ve heard that stealing identity has become a very profitable business. Before entering into any one of these systems someone forgot to figure out where it is going to lead them. Which side of development do you think they’ll enter? Negative of course. A side that ruins their lives in those systematic circumstances they’ve got themselves into. Forgetting that even the law speaks of itself and pushes you to stay on the Positive side of development. However, some people choose to be on a positive side of development. They too are entering into systematic circumstances only the difference is that this system will bring them success in the Field of Goodness. What is contained in the field of goodness? Successful faith, successful family, successful business; and a lot more than that. I just stated the most important major elements of goodness. Today I want to help you transfer yourself into Positive Development, and stay there. You know why? Because you deserve to be happy. Simple as that.
Aren't these cranberry topiaries darling?
(c) Copyright 2010 Forest Applications Training, Inc.
Leto
-Fresh grated Parmesan cheese
We have had several people donate to help bring Jonathan home. I am amazed at the goodness of our Lord and the wonderful friendships Mark and I have formed through our adoptions. We are truly blessed!
Though increased blood flow is good for baby, it might be making you a little...damp. Body secretions (think sweat, mucus, nosebleeds, and vaginal discharge) are in full force. This week might also mark the first time you feel baby move inside you, but don't worry if it's another two months before you notice anything. (Or realize that this time, it's actually not gas.)
In your first days as humans it was important to you to take time each day for your daily rituals. These rituals recharged your spirit. You gave thanks and gratitude for the world around you. You honored God and Goddess as the loving energy that exists in all things, including yourself.
“You know, May the fourth. Can we leave a little early for school?”
First beer of the night is Wentworth brewerys Bumble beer. The brewery describes this beer as 'a golden honeyed ale using 4 different local honeys to make a distinctive and ever changing ale with rounded flavours. What this means i have no idea but im a big fan of honey ales so looking forward to opening. Right well no head to start with no matter how the pour is done, the smells however are great (if you like honey) you can really notice the honey on the nose that some people may say is a little too heavy but personally this is the first I've found that gives a nice big punch, aside from this theres a small hint of hops on the side that is noticeable but not till the end. A fairly sweet beer, i'd say this would be a beer for someone starting on ale as it's sweet and theres very little to hate about it but unfortunately at this point for me theres little to really find in terms of depth of flavour at this point. Over all simple, sweet and very pale. Not amazing but worth a try and could be interesting to compare at different times if the year for the different subtle honey tastes.
Last May, I included Complete Aphotic in Allotment III of my annual of archetypal Nintendo amateur that haven't been remade, but should be. Beneath than a ages afterwards at E3, Microsoft arise Complete Aphotic for the Xbox Reside Arcade. At the time it articulate like the bold would just be a anchorage of the N64 bold alive in 1080p with online multiplayer, but a few months afterwards Attenuate arise screenshots assuming new top resolution textures replacing the originals. On Advance 17th, Microsoft Bold Studios arise their adjustment of the N64 classic, ported by 4J Studios.
Because you apathetic little parasites would just gobble up the 1 percent’s stuff with your free houses, and your free education, and your free internet access, and your free health care, and your free bullshit… Briefly, but then the money would be gone, and you’d still be an apathetic little parasite. But now since you’ve installed a government amoral and powerful enough to truly not give a shit, this time when you take to the streets they will just kill your ass.
her body, and a “possible old
Stress is like that. It’s an unavoidable part of life.
Thank you, Abba, that you teach us who we are in you. I pray that even when the circumstances suggest otherwise, or we don’t feel like your word is truth, we would CHOOSE to walk in who you say we are. And I praise you that who we are to you is beautiful! That we are beautiful amidst the brokenness…because you say we are. Thank you that we are in the process. That our journey is all about the process. Thank you for walking with us through it all. You are such a good, gracious God. We love you.
Dialogue: 6,0:01:21.37,0:01:24.54,Default,,0000,0000,0000,,Considering the huge variety of clubs that Kamiyama High School has,
We decided to embrace the never ending rain yesterday and headed to Wales. If you’re going to get drenched, you might as well do it right – and Wales definitely knows what it’s doing when it comes to rain.
OK maybe a tad psychotic... think I'll have to work on this. Maybe I'll work on the synopsis instead.
The soft frail voice startled me. I quickly turned to find an old woman behind me. It took me only a second to recognize her weathered face. I wanted to hug her but did not move.
Jess will be placing books under the Kmart tree in Tasmania, Rachel in NSW and Brodie in Victoria.
I'm hoping to write about this year's gorgeous garlic harvest and my recent garlic planting soon, but you know how that goes. In the meantime you'll find all of my previous garlic growing posts here.
Ronald E. Neumann, the U.S. ambassador to Afghanistan from 2005 to 2007, told Risen, "Karzai is convinced that we are going to abandon him. What's his answer? To create a web of loyalties and militia commanders and corrupt families all knitted together."
So, here's the big "lesson" with these three things. I think we've all got stuff we'd like to undo. But that's weight we carry around. And it's more difficult to let passions bubble up if we refuse to let go of that weight. It's more difficult to live out beauty.
Plenty more variations out there for you to try yourself, but the pattern sticks. Goddard cherrypicked a short dataset that most favored his position and then recreated the graph to hide the incline. It then got picked up by Watts (who tempered it slightly) and spewed everywhere (I found it first at TigerHawk and traced it back).
But never seek the support of kings,
Are you crazy for pumpkin yet?
They go inside and it’s the same ol same ol thing of silence, angsting and people having lots of feelings. And some symbolism about lilies and a fish tank.
The model of my new home looks like the photo below and let me tell you - it's B E A U T I F U L!!!
Each night I’m sitting at my computer fiddling away with minutiae that probably won’t end up affecting anything. I’m constantly writing lists for myself, of things I need to do, things I need to find, to buy, to borrow, and people I need to contact. It’s the perfect procrastination and excuse to avoid study and assessment that does also need to be addressed, but why do that when you’ve got an eight month trip to Europe to plan!
1998: 270 deaths
Sources say that her PR machinery is allegedly working overtime on these remuneration stories to give the impression that she has scored over Kareena.
Omo omo omo~!!!
Week 20 – lose another product, swap in 1 more cup raw veggies, 8 more oz dairy, 1 tsp oil, and 1/2 cup cooked grains or 1 oz slice bread (carbs! but not many…)
beneath this sky
Each website is like an archive because they record everything in the hopes that interested potential viewers could come and catch up at any time. This made research much simpler because the networks want you to know all about their shows so they provide a lot of information and videos. The problem was how to make sense of it. I wanted my audience to be anyone who could access the websites themselves (someone the networks would hypothetically be considering themselves when they were creating the websites). But I wanted to organize it in a way that showed my own sense of discerning selection. Below I included my personal contribution which is the comprehensive list of shows that are non-news, non-reality and all of the characters which I compiled using the network websites, the Internet Movie Data Base, and as a baseline for simple concepts for each show, Wikipedia, although I made sure to check that information. I was interested to see that you can easily Google a list of gay television characters which, while not entirely comprehensive, is interesting largely because of its inherent distinction of character types by sexuality. You cannot Google a list of heterosexual television characters. It’s too normalized.
Bird embellishment.
Ready?
The difference between nothing and something is infinite.
You will no longer need to recheck your baggage upon exiting Customs.
Good question, Diane. How could such a focused organization operate so long and so damn effectively.. without the complicity of Democrats, that is, corporate Democrats? And where was the Democrat Party whose platform and primary interests suggest populist causes? Shame on them. And where are the professional organizations known as unions that should be protecting the interests of Michigan teachers?
As Ratchlet came to give us a hug goodbye, I realized she had tears also! Oh no!! Was everybody going to cry?? They were sick. They weren't having a good time! No need to cry!! Well, they managed to bring the tears under control and went back from whence they came.
One evening, post dive, I was sitting in the bar swapping travelling tales with a 30-something Spanish diplomat called Fernando. He was entertaining company and we’d been whiling away a lazy evening with much laughter and a couple of drinks. The Commando appeared, with a friend, and had become our custom I hailed them to join our table, introduced them to Fernando and continued with the jokes. But the atmosphere had suddenly changed and conversation was frosty. I was perplexed. I did my best to drag everyone into the chat but failed to engage them. It was a tumbleweed moment.
Once "hardware error" is properly understood as "error in the hardware," it's clear to a POSITA that the reference doesn't teach. While memory usage reaching a critical point may qualify as an error related to memory, it is not an error in the memory itself. The Applicant tried to make this point in the Appeal Brief, but apparently didn't explain the point well enough.
Can my lack of focus really be related to not rubbing one down? The anxiety and fragmentation of my thoughts and actions? As I said, I continued to think about this, through dinner, through the baby’s bedtime. And I was fucking wet, just from thinking about masturbating… Not even imagining doing it, but just thinking about this whole concept. Shortly after the munchkin was asleep, I followed M to bed, and we fucked. Good and hard, but quietly (both baby and step-mom in the house). And I came. A lot.
Christopher opened one eye and winked at me. He mouthed, “It didn’t really hit me,” and a surge of relief rushed over me.
Rice Cakes
Anyway, defying all logic, the child has, in fact, been kidnapped from under Kyle's (Foster) nose and secreted away somewhere on the airplane. Nobody, not one fucking person, on the plane sees or remembers a man going somewhere on the plane with a young girl in his arms. The man, the kidnapper, as it turns out, is a sky marshal. His accomplice is one of the flight attendants. It's all part of a complicated (i.e. stupidly elaborate and illogical), Rube-Goldberg-device-like plot to extort a large sum of money from the airline and leave Kyle as the (dead) patsy. You see, they killed Kyle's husband and somehow managed to get themselves on the same flight back to the states. Kyle is some kind of airplane engineer, so they know she'll know where to look for her daughter and would have the necessary skills to plant a bomb on the plane. They've bribed a funeral home operator to tell the pilot that Kyle's husband killed himself and their daughter so everyone will think Kyle is crazy. Do I need to go on? For fuck's sake, whatever happened to just sticking a gun in someone's face and saying "give me the money"?
Q039) What do you do to get confidence?
Take a cooked and cooled oval cookie and paint it with yellow royal icing. Ensure the icing is smooth. You may want to use the flooding technique. Allow to dry. Meanwhile, cut cracked egg shapes from the fondant. I did this free hand but my main method was: use cookie as a rough template, cut round shape first, then free-hand zig-zag shape for the cracked egg. Once you've cut the egg fondant, place it at the bottom of the yellow cookie. Smooth out the fondant and tuck any extra hanging bits around the side of the cookie. Now paint the orange beak in a triangle shape and orange feet if desired over the white fondant. Also paint black eyes on the cookie in any shape you desire. You may use the white in conjuction with the black to create eyes. Continue until all cookies are decorated!
With Muni making a name for himself on the stage it was only a matter of time before Hollywood came knocking, especially as it was during this time that the invasion of the talkies had begun. Muni made his film debut at Fox Studios in “The Valiant” 1929 with Marguerite Churchill. He received the 1st of his 6 Oscar nominations for best actor but lost out to Warner Baxter. It was at Fox that he was, much to his chagrin, given the name Paul Muni. He was often called “The New Lon Chaney” something he resented but with due respect
It is purportedly a cross of Blueberry and Haze, with some stories going so far as to specify a “Santa Cruz haze” while other stories specifying “DJ Shorts Blueberry” x “Mr. Nice Super Silver Haze.” It is possible of course that both stories are accurate, as it is certainly possible (likely) that there are multiple cuts of Blue Dream circulating around California. At this time Blue Dream is a clone-only strain though there are seed versions starting to appear on the market.
tries to answer. The next most important thing is to find out what the author’s controlling principles are, because they will govern how he answers those questions. Then decide whether he adheres to them throughout his work. If a philosopher is inconsistent, you have to decide which he really means, the first principles, as he states them, or the conclusions, which don’t actually follow from the principles he stated. Or you can decide that neither is valid.
I believe the mystery of loneliness can be unravelled in the exploration of the two elements, concept and nature.
The world’s elite sprinters can’t run head to head any more. Heaven forbid that they lose – they may shrivel up and die! Elite sprinters can only show up and run against each other when ALL the conditions are perfect. Powell and Gay raced every week in ‘06 until Gay became elite. After that it was majors only in ‘07 & ‘08 and no races yet this year. Bolt and Gay ran against each other all the time in ‘05, ‘06 & ‘07. Bolt blew up in ‘08 and all we got in ‘09 was Berlin and we’re not scheduled to see them on the track again until August 27th of this year!
Animal print socks, River Island €5.50
In time I returned to the Camp and rejoined the team for the final day of discussions and vision planning, but for a brief hour, it was just me and God, a beach and a reminder: God is present and He loves it when I spend time walking and praying with Him.
3. The next paragraph dives right in and here’s a fun comparison. The Harry Potter cover flap copy started with what Harry has not done (Quidditch, ride a broom, dragon hatching). In a similar vein (but reversed), the LYKY cover copy tells us what Cammie is capable of (an impressive and fun list that captures our attention) but then launches into what she hasn’t done—and that’s fall in love with a boy.
1. Combine teriyaki sauce and pineapple juice in a small, non-aluminum saucepan. Stir in the cornstarch until dissolved.
“It’s also a finance issue as well, I have a small budget to work with, so things we want done can’t happen I can only offer what’s available already,” said Mr.Trivedi. He hands over a picture of a group of students on a boat ride. “A few years back we went on this ferry ride and had a big dinner, because of the increase in students and decrease of money, I can’t do fun things like that anymore,” said Mr.Trivedi.
Some authors do more planning in advance than others, but the minimum at this stage is to have an idea about the identity of the book you're going to write and start to think about your characters and the situations you're going to put them in. If there are areas you're not sure about, this is the point when you need to start thinking about where to go to fill in any gaps in your knowledge. It may be a matter of net surfing; perhaps there are non-fiction books you'll want to get hold of; or museums you need to visit; or people to speak to.
Last night, at our bedtime chalice lighting, B was thankful for muscles, initially. Then he suddenly exclaimed “No! No wait! Worrrrds. I’m thankful for words! Did you know there are more than 3000 words in a book?”
Deleuze, Gille, On The Movement-Image,” in Negotiation 1972-1990, trans. Martin Joughin (New York: Columbia University Press, 1995), pp. 45-56
Leo claims to have seen Mildred Packer himself in the summer of 1983. Red River sits in a steep valley high in the Southern Rocky Mountains. In the center of town, is a large, steep hill that overlooks the entire city. Generally, this hill is far too steep to attempt to hike but every once in a while, some idiots will try to hike it and throngs of people in the town below gawk upwards and wait and watch for the idiots to lose their balance and plummet to their deaths below. No one has actually ever died falling from the hill as far as I know, but it doesn’t stop people from watching and hoping…
Forgetting the academic side for a moment, the media, particularly television and movies, also has a big part to play in teaching your kids social skills. You may have noticed your child quoting Star Wars in answer to a question. The quote was probably in context and used at least half-jokingly. It's sill a perfect example of how your child is bringing their social learning from the media into everyday life.
Who said I won’t enjoy the weekends?
when his heart is pure,
Gregory Porter ~ 1960 What? (Opolopo Kick & Bass Remix) ~ Tokyo Dawn Records ~ 2011
This a straw man argument. The Save Our Pubs campaign is calling for ventilated smoking rooms adjacent to the bar, not for "the bad old days of smoky pubs" (y'know, those bad old days when pubs weren't closing in their thousands). There has always been public support for a law that accommodates smokers and nonsmokers alike because the British, in general, are a tolerant and reasonable bunch. This makes ASH a profoundly unBritish organisation. As with all extremists, compromise and tolerance are their natural enemy, which is why ASH will fight tooth and nail to make sure that tools of denormalisation and social exclusion remain law.
“Sleep Arham sleep. Nothing is wrong.” He told himself and then tried to sleep yet again.
Hubby and me managed to get pregnant really quickly with our son - now 11 and a half - but since he was 2 we have been actively trying to get pregnant with no success.
Dont'cha just love these colours together? And have you ordered any stamps from the new release? I'm waiting for mine to arrive - I couldn't order them til Monday cos I was waiting for the ones I wanted to be restocked....I can't wait til they arrive so I can ink them up, they're gorgeous!!! Anyhoo, I told ya it would be a quick post, bye for now......xx
Let’s keep in mind that the Harper Cons haven’t merely poured hundreds of millions of dollars into CCS: they’ve in fact done so to the exclusion of any other climate-change funding (since their initial period of poorly-feigned interest in the environment when Stephane Dion was Lib leader).
they summoned
Mom replies, "No, because she is in heat."
Next up, the floor. I need a rug. I have been hopeless in this area because I haven't seen a single rug that I like.. NOT ONE. I thought I wanted something worn and a little frayed but for some reason, it just doesn't fit "me".
She's had the same ('non-intrusive') editor for all of her books, who's just retired.
I was last in line, and since we hadn’t had a “plan” for this, I was momentarily unsure as to what to do.
DW: So this would have been like a paramilitary swat team that would have swept in.
The main improvement initiative I’m undertaking currently is to pick up things that have fallen on the ground. I’m still okay with stuff that’s supposed to be down there — pebbles, earthworms, the drunken homeless — but I’m trying to put forth a real effort to make my world a better place with the simple act of bending down and retrieving discarded litter. Some people have chosen to help earthquake victims; I’m thinking that charity begins at home, in an approximately three-foot radius of where I’m standing.
“Oh.”
Bonus section
86 YEARS IN THE PAST
About Robert Half International
Points, also, to the wine selection. Bottles were reasonably priced (about $30-50), and they were selected to complement the meal. The wines were crisp and fresh and went will with the vegetables that took center stage at the dinner.
I was carved
They checked around, learned Peter Paul Prier was THE place to get the best violins, and without telling me flew to Utah, made a purchase, returned home one evening and surprised me with my new violin! They told me it was a very good violin, that I needed to take care of it–and that if for some reason I ever needed to sell it someday I should return to Peter Paul Prier and sell it back to him. That’s what Mr. Prier had told them.
Thru it I learned so much about myself, people, energy, void times. It was the pilot light of a life long passion that has since grown, changed, enhanced every ounce of my life and the lives of others.
It’s singing in my heart
To try to obviate the need to assign a “task” to promote analytical thinking, the researchers then conducted
Do you have any autistic superpowers? What are they?
£5 a ticket - £100 First prize.
Now dear readers, you have been warned. If I do not post anything for a while, please send someone to see if the possum zombies have gotten their revenge.
More responsive and proactive legal advice
Miami represents a total lifestyle change for me. No decisions to make bigger than when to head to the beach; where to grab a cocktail and whether to hit Lincoln Road or Ocean Drive when I get to South Beach.
Curl around
** Ibid., Nos. 3, 4, and 5, in the Table.
Terrafugia’s CEO/CTO, Co-Founder, Carl received his BS, MS and Ph.D. from the Department of Aeronautics and Astronautics at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) shortly after being selected as the 2006 winner of the prestigious Lemelson-MIT Student Prize for Innovation.
Atheists, but not religious people, will love this paper from the latest Science, “Analytical thinking promotes religious disbelief,” (reference below) by Will Gervais and Ara Norenzayan, two psychologists from the University of British Columbia (see also this popular summary in the Los Angeles Times). It shows that there’s an antagonism between analytical thinking and religious belief, such that after engaging in even a short and simple task requiring analytical thinking, one’s faith in God weakens.
Traeger Mashed Potatoes
She is disappointed not merely because he escaped from prison, but because he is fleeing the country and is not willing to fight the system and clear his name anymore. She allows him to take money from her safe, but tells him she's going to change her will. He will probably be cut out of it.
It’s an extra advance that the author will now earn out but is likely to because if the bonus clause was triggered, the book is doing well.
I love your comments. You can leave one by scrolling down to the end of the post and click on comments
Decodens I bought from Daiso, Arab Street and Beadtle sweet I think.
The price tag on memorials is continuously raising. Fortuitously, you’ll find plants for almost each price range. You possibly can show by yourself smoothly using something as simple as one particular perfective roseate, because economical being a minor blended agreement, or even since eye-catching as a grande standing up squirt regarding graceful tulips as well as lilies. With regard to gifts towards the funeral parlour as well as memorial service service, clean blossom plans within decorative accents in addition to fan-molded fellow feeling types are usually greatest, simply because they provide the nearly all impingement for the investment. Empathy flowers come in a diverse range of sizes and also prices. The choice can be anyone, fresh fruits there might be some other flowery tributes shown throughout near vicinity. So, ensure skimp upon size. To get a good kitchen table agreement, anticipate paying with regards to $40 to $75, together with nicer looking variations operating $75 or higher. For a bigger position bit, $75 to help $one hundred and fifty is typical. With regard to presents towards the residence, both blossoms as well as seed tend to be popular, together with costs usually in the $30 in order to $59 assortment.
As I sat there sobbing, I felt a hand on my shoulder. I turned to see our nurse through my tears. She had been our nurse in the NICU already, so I knew her and was comfortable with her. She wrapped her arms around me and told me that she was going to take care of him like he was her own. She took me by the shoulders and made me look into her eyes. Once I could finally look at her, she told me that my baby was going to be fine. She told me he would be strong and healthy. She basically took charge of me in that moment and helped me pull it together long enough to walk out the door. She had my whole world in her hands.
I saw no one else remotely interested in the cemetery as people walked on the beach just feet away passing the sign with so much history information about the settlers to this area and their families lives. What a shame! I on the other hand loved doing this for you and now report it so that you too can come see Florida’s “Lost Cemetery By The Sea”!
Alcohol By Volume : 6.90%
I love visiting my friend, Jan, at The Bittersweet Cabin (please stop by her facebook page and “like” it – I told her I’d invite all my friends!!!). We always have so much fun catching each other up on junk and laughing, and sharing ideas. I also met a good friend of hers, and was asked to make some things for her daughter’s wedding – I’m so excited!!
It revealed that given the current context of myself in that moment, the only reference points I had to process “Equal Money” were based on my already accepted beliefs, ideas, perceptions and thus, I rejected it. I classified it in the “Money Category” which in itself in the context of how I had/have constructed/designed my belief system was classified under “Not-Relevant”. Thus anything to do with Money was “Not Relevant”
There was great excitement earlier in the week when we got our copy of a magazine which is going to feature our work next month. The excitement was because on the page showing whats coming next month there was a photograph of our cushions. We will tell you what magazine it is when it is out - we still can`t quite believe its going to happen.
successfully used over the past few years they are now creating the possibility of having all
It has all been given a couple of coats of non-yellowing clear varnish to seal it and it is ready to hang in our bathroom:)
Only knows if someone wants her
amy: the piano for me is a sort of lifeline .. since i was a child it has felt like it's pulling strings inside me, like nothing else i experience . the piano for me is much more than just an instrument, but a sound of solace, a harbor .
I am always amazed, and a bit dismayed, at just how fleeting time is! It's picking up speed with each passing year. So, before December is over I need to document (with a few posts) the great time our family had when we were all together at Thanksgiving :)
Maybe Ben Ali already knew what would happen the next day. Maybe he had already packed his bags. But did Mubarak know? Did Qaddafi?
"Right TEAM" Ted barks at us all - I think he is trying to be motivational but he just looks red and a little sweaty. "I want you all to sell sell sell this week and beat every target."
A recent flood of beer blogs regarding “cans, bottles, kegs or casks” has in my view failed to mention what is arguably one of the finest ways of delivering cooking lager direct into the human anatomy. As most cooking lager enthusiasts know, the world of beer is full of fine examples of beer innovation coupled with a preservation of tradition. The flavours offered the beer enthusiast are many and varied, but the pinnacle of beer is clear by looking at the most popular beers sold. The public are not wrong, they vote with their feet and wallet, and cooking lager sits atop the great pyramid of beer as the finest example of what beer should be. That is cold, fizzy and neckable.
Lizo Mzimba: Very sad news that Elisabeth Sladen has died.
But guilt is something me and my people have had a lot of experience with. And I've turned getting over it quickly into somewhat of an art form.
Steam
It’s hard for us to see this, argue the authors, because, we humans are wired, after several millennia, to think and act in terms of scarcity. But if we focus on the nature of the technologies and the ways we can use them, Diamindis and Kolter assure us we can actually provide food, shelter and health for everyone on the planet. We can turn Maslow’s pyramid into an abundance pyramid. And we can move all the world’s people into that favored place on every chart – the upper right hand corner of health and wealth. Or, at least give everyone that possibility.
Congrats Kianel. We'll be sending you our Guest Designer button and details on the next challenge very soon.
Our good friend, Taos resident Sarah Hart of Hart Print Shop (hartprintshop.com), designs and prints all of our flyers on recycled beer boxes. "She's an incredibly talented woman and we're blessed to have her in our lives," says Kevyn Gilbert. “With her help, we also make all our own shirts, underwear, beer koozies and other stuff.”
Liberty pondered this while she munched on her sandwich. After two seconds of silence, she asked, "Mommy? What was your name when you were a little tiny baby?"
Today I had to do some running around.
All the links for the Design Teams blogs are in the sidebar (or you can click on their names above the pics) so please go and have a look to find out exactly how they have created their projects and leave them some love. :o)
Hope all of you are having a good Sunday, as I am, SHADOWS, hmmm, be careful, you can see in your shadow what you are might not be, or, what you would like to be...
(1) They use the money to stimulate the economy, because the wealthy are “jobs creators.”
Hello Everyone!! Spring is here (although sometimes that is hard to believe considering how cool it has been lately), so let's celebrate by using your Copics to create a SPRING themed project!!! You could focus on Spring flowers, or perhaps Spring showers, pastels or even Spring Cleaning!!! Let's see how Springtime inspires you!!!
The official cause of death will by determined by the Los Angeles county coroner's office, but police said they saw no sign of foul play.
As with any giveaway, there are some rules:
Why do people waste time complaining about everything? Seriously? I often want to say, "Does all that negativity make you tired? Because it wears me out."
I decided to roam around San Pedro (a smaller city that borders San Jose) on my own to make some city discoveries. My key discovery was British-inspired cupcakes in Costa Rica!!! I found this adorable little bakery called Sweet Sensations that is owned by a young English woman from England, now living in Costa Rica. The design of everything inside the mini cafe/bakery screamed British Invasion. The cupcake selection ranged from fudge-filled to flavoured cheesecake ones that had real cheesecake inside. For those of you who are relentlessly wondering, I did ask her if she’d heard about the recent British boyband craze in Canada and America. Her answer was NO…and she barely had any knowledge of who One Direction even is. Goes to show how behind Costa Ricans are in pop culture! This sweetspot is definitely one of my faves in the city thus far and will be one of my go-to hangouts. Let’s collectively take a moment to pray for my thighs at this time.
Akshayananda: He said he couldn’t understand it, but he thought, he said that he thought…
Check these out…..
śyāmāc chavalaṁ prapadye
An angel without wings,
Out dallying with Sue and Kate
I started the redo by taking the trim off the island:
The.
Both “Mars at Night” (the short story in Girl Meets Boy) and my first novel, Jake Riley: Irreparably Damaged take place on farms in Iowa like the one where I grew up. Neither one of those stories of much of anything to do with what happened to me, but the place—the place is real—and it’s so fun to write about the farm because it’s like being back there again.
Today I am admitting my electronic addictions. It began with a Kindle.
Z - The best place to visit:somewhere warm
I can relate to him on many different levels— minus the ability to write gruesome horror stories… Like Poe, I lost my mother and my father had left when I was young. I was adopted and so was Poe. He struggled with mental illness and despite the fact that my husband has called me crazy several times, I have been diagnosed with ADD, Bipolar and Generalized Anxiety Disorder. Hey, what do ya know? It is always the crazy ones who are creative.
1473 D-IX/18/2003. “Two Years Later: Lessons for Lawyers and other Citizens.” “September 11” (with Michael J. Howlett, Jr., Charles W. Murdock, Alan Raphael, and Allen E. Shoenberger). Panel. The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in B-14 (Projected), above, Part B-13.)
This is where my smaller leaf color studies yesterday are important. I know that I'll be coloring each leaf using the YG03 family and G21/G28. Becasue the G21 and G28 are going to be used on both leaves in front and leaves in back then it's OK if I don't use the YG03 both in front and back, since the other colors will tie in the background leaves.
We don’t need to fear those who worship Islam, Congressman. We need to fear bomb-strapped radicals who use their religion as an excuse to inflict their hate, and more often than you’ll ever understand, there’s a big difference between the two. Just as there’s a difference between the Timothy McVeighs of the world who would twist the teachings of Christianity to suit their evil tendencies.
Quite a few of you have asked me what have I been creating while Veronica was away and of course it's another excuse to blog too.
How can you bet against the success of a corporation, and somehow pull money from a decaying entity and its lowered stock value?
This was one of last nights Stamp Club projects!
Did I embarrass her in some way?
b) The prohibition for the Defendants to perform new editions of the book or the video, or of other books and/or videos, that defend the same thesis, and that are destined to be sold or published by any means whatsoever in Portugal;
In China, meanwhile, factional tensions are also rising with three main factions allying themselves with different factions in the battle for control over the financial system of the West.
I love snowmobiling. Flying over the snow, catching air over drifts. I love to drive, to be at the helm of the beast as I weave around trees and over hill and dale, my husband sitting behind me. I also love riding behind my husband as he drives, feeling those powerful arms as he’s muscling the snowmobile into the wilds. We follow unknown trails, driven by a Magellan spirit, hoping that we have enough gas to get us back to civilization. I love hanging on, simply trusting him, knowing that wherever he’s taking me, he’s going first.
they say bees can fly faster than you can run
Be kind to me, or treat me mean
My glitter isn't going anywhere!!!!
I purchased my copy of this book while traveling in Gettysburg.
The trees, their heads bowed, cried ceaselessly.
Mix the flour and salt in a large bowl. Cut in the shortening until it resembles cornmeal. Gradually add about 1 cup lukewarm water. Mix until the dough leaves the sides of the bowl, like biscuit dough. Turn the dough out onto a floured board and knead as you would for yeast bread for at least 5 minutes. Divide the dough into 12 balls and let set covered by a towel or the bowl for 15 minutes to relax the dough so it will be easier to work with. Roll out each piece on a floured surface. Roll as thin as you can. Heat a large cast iron skillet, add no grease. Fry, turn and fry the other side. There will be bubbles and those will get dark but that adds character.
During his press conference on Friday, James indicated that he was told he will likely go in the third round. His relatively diminutive size (5′ 9″, 195 pounds) is the likely reason he will not be a first-rounder. But it is his speed combined with agility and a seemingly innate talent to break tackles that will bring a lucrative pay day.
With his rather flimsy wings,
In addition to fashion and beauty experts, you’ll be able to meet with other wedding vendors in the tri-state area, including: Elan Artisits, Fleurs and Classic Party Rentals. Wedding consultants from Always a Bridesmaid will also be available to give you expert planning advice.
Active dry yeast- 1 1/8 tsp
Addison held the phone firmly to her ear, her teeth chattering as she looked nervously around her like someone were going to jump out. “What the hell where those things Christian? Where did they come from?”
2) I need to figure a way to signal the guest. I can see when we have one minute left, but how do I tell them to wrap it up? Working on a series of complicated winks. Or maybe there's an industry trick someone can share with me.
The egging of ones face,
Look at the picture above of former glamorous but failed CEO Dato Fuad Dahalan in In Focus magazine. He failed as a CEO and destroyed the hope of ever a CEO to come from within MAS.
As for the mattress, while I’m optimistic that it can be done, Roommate is not granting me the satisfaction of trying. So much for parting gifts…
Will, despite your best efforts, forever hang limp in their hunger
Login
This is the opening context for setting up my reading of this quote found on a friend’s page:
There were three Mild Ales, imaginatively named X, XX and XXX. Let's take a look at them more closely.
Kerri, Nana, and I had a fun day shopping yesterday, and planning an upcoming party (I will post more about it at a later date).
If I were to invest in any home improvement I would consider building a rootcellar. If you do not want to dig a big hole in the ground you can build a small room in a cold part of your cellar to preserve food for the winter. With a rootcellar you can store winter squash, potatoes, apples, onions, garlic, cabbage and so much more.
Oh just one more little thing to share. Do you see that little vintage sewing box standing next to the chest:
1: Yes you can!
Because when you make an accusation like that you'd better be able to prove it. You'd better have bruises and medical reports. And I didn't.
Will: also the elderly are too rich and powerful
HURRY UP PLEASE ITS TIME
So, imagine how interested I was to read my newest issue of Scientific American Mind. There’s an article which explains it all in brain science terms. Seems we need space around us - and especially above us - in order to have creative ideas. And there’s growing research into this, with many architecture schools now incorporating neuroscience as well as environmental psychology into their syllabus. The environmental psychology isn’t new, but the neuroscience is.
It's fun to listen to each Dukes of Stratosphear song and try to figure out which real groups and songs inspired it. As we discussed, "Pale and Precious" is an absolutely perfect Beach Boys song -- probably the best Beach Boys song ever recorded (which is high praise indeed). It's modeled primarily on "Good Vibrations," but has bits and pieces of many other Beach Boys songs.
The butler failed to remember to put in a good word for Joseph with the Pharaoh.
Dom has built strong and lasting relationships with alumni, fans, and supporters and has represented the Department of Athletics and the George Washington University with class and dignity. He has been not only a trusted advisor but also a good friend who will be greatly missed.
My friend's name is not "Susan"...I changed it because I don't want any harm to come to her or her family!
Little Man definitely keeps us in stitches. He has the absolute best personality! Recent obsessions also include Tho.mas the Train and B0b the Buil.der. He has a B0b doll that he must know the location of at all times or else a freak out will commence.
”I need to go!” Arthur said again
People work long and hard to obtain a status so they can lord over people. People work long and hard to get the money to get servants. People work to obtain the status of being in charge. But does money and status make one person better than another? Does status and money make a person able to lord anything over anyone else?
brighter days and mighty waves
When I visited a different hairdresser for balayage recently (different country), she was completely mystified about why my other stylist would have told me to stop using conditioner but agreed my hair was definitely in good shape despite it. This always seems to happen – one hair stylist tells you something, another tells you something completely different.
Happy Birthday RC! Thank you for being my music mentor and especially my friend. May our friendship last through decades of music. I love you.
16. Overall, which show has the better cast, 3 or 5? Lizard Lick Towing
1 tablespoon curry powder
Helping other people get to my stage is so much easier!
It could be worse, much worse.
Do you use Twitter to follow your neighborhood health systems, hospitals, physicians or support groups for disease? Tell me about it!
8. Place in the oven to bake for 10 min then reduce the heat to 350 F and bake for about 20 to 30 min.
Siblinginbox and I have been emailing about this article with a title that sums up the intent of every government bureaucracy. I received the response that follows:
I am going to enter this piece into The Artisitic Stampers monthly Challange at http://theartisticstampercreativeteam.blogspot.co.uk/2012/05/may-challenge-spots-and-stripes.html, which this months theme is "Spots and Stripes". I definetly think it fits the theme and I really enjoy entering different challenges so I can see how other people interpret the themes set by the designers. I find it helps the creative juices flow. I love The Artisitc Stampers design style and hope I do well inthe challenge!
Pressure points.
two cars in order to get onto my motorway!
At the end of the day, writing a blog is something you do because you want to, and what you write should be a reflection of that. If nothing else, you are your own audience, and if writing is a drudge or a bore, it’s OK to do something else. If you’re having fun writing and engaging with any commenters who happen to wander by, hey, that’s icing on the cake.
Sitting (2007) Sophie Ryder. It is naturally a very eye-catching piece as it is both unusual and the scale draws your attention. It devalues the human bogy by attaching the rabbit head which makes people more interested in the piece. The material creates an interesting texture by using wire mesh and the gap in between the body although a simple action creates a profound layer of symbolism
I remember an episode of Full House (I'm not ashamed) where something like this happened. Here's what I remember of the conversation between Kimmy Gibbler and DJ.
Black Boy and, to a lesser extent, his brother, have been neighbors and friends to my family since we moved to Mountain Town on December 17, 2005. Black Boy is twenty now, but his penchant for a good joke and a good time has been undimmed by the years since we met as teenagers.
Does this even make sense? who cares. I'm having fun. Oh no, the French band is coming up. The token French girl at our party is going nuts. We need some rope to tie her down.
Guys. This question is practically IMPOSSIBLE for me to answer. Distilling all the thousands of books I've read over the years into one or two favorites? How in the world do I choose? How do I decide what's my favorite?
I have my life before me. I will give others the joy I have and God will give me more joy. I will do everything God tells me to do. I will follow the footsteps of God. I will do my best!!!
I was walking across the field last evening and stumbled on my left foot, somehow twisting my ankle. I looked moronic for awhile as I just stood there motionless like some Greek/Roman statue. I noticed a guy at the exercise area looking at me, but he didn’t say anything. I then hobbled over to a seat and evaluated my circumstances. Then, I walked home.
Method 1 : Cook the egg and tomatoes separately then mix them together. This is my preferred method too. Most people like to cook the egg first then the tomatoes, but I like to do the reverse. I find cooking the eggs first if it is still soft, the egg will set to a large lump when adding to the cooked tomatoes.
Forced Marriage (BBC report) – the youngest girl from UK to be forced into marriage is 5 yrs. old – the oldest was 87. There were 400 children who received help from the forced marraige unit last year – but the true figure could be 1000’s – it is a unit that you (or smeone concerned) have to call.
Oh my! It took a prize like this ($25 Stampin Up) to get me into the world of blogging!! I love the new Get Your Sketch On website!!
On the other side of the expanse, you have a group of white folks who are scratching their heads, wondering why THIS case is so important, so egregious that the Attorney General of the United States has not only weighed in, but is actively steering it. Holder recently spoke in front of a group founded by Al Sharpton. He promised the audience the feds would pursue charges if at all possible. I'm paraphrasing, but that was the gist of it. Why the AG would be speaking or associated with anything related to Al is as perplexing and disturbing as any element in the Trayvon/Zimmerman case. The President has added fuel to the fire. He stuck his nose into the Police vs. Gates debacle. Called the cop stupid, sided with Gates. Then along comes this most recent mess. Obama does not disappoint. He says if he had a son, he would look like Trayvon. His imaginary son might also look like the hoods in the video above. The stunner is why the AG or the President feel the need to comment on the case, yet have remained mute about the bounty and dead or alive comments from the new and improved Black Panthers. Neither Holder nor Obama have bothered to comment or take action regarding the racially motivated crimes like Knockout King or Polar Bear hunting. They have not commented, at least not that I recall, on the inordinate number of crimes committed by and against a small minority of this nation.
First cycling for fun, then shopping, then commuting to work, then to carry on a commercial activity at a place of doing business. That is progress: expanding the usefulness of a marketable product.
I have not yet received my Welcome email. According to the Pottermore Insider they will be letting in a “very small number of people onto the website” at first. But they will continue to be activating accounts for the next few weeks.
16.Stripling Brothers / Wolves Howling
Our family still all came, lovingly waiting to see if Oldest would be better.
Although I normally associate Winnie The Pooh with very small people (perhaps because it has been so abused as a nursery motif), the humor is actually quite sophisticated and while it tickles my seven-year-old, his five-year-old brother's laugh usually comes one tell-tale moment behind. Still, even if you are not in on every joke, the narration is beautiful and soothing. A good choice for days when a calming effect is needed.
So happy I have finally joined a book club! I need to get on reading this new book :) Happy to be introduced to some new literature I would have never thought about reading before. Ready to expand my horizons!
Entry level wages for male college graduates fell to an average of $21.68 an hour last year, down 11% from 2001, according to a new report from the Economic Policy Institute, a left-leaning group.
4. We picked up a rice crispy treat the size of my head for dessert - also not on my wedding "diet"
Ludo and the Star Horse by Mary Stewart
The story opens the night before Lennie and George report to a new workplace. Through dialogue we learn that Lennie loves to pet small soft things, including a dead mouse he has hidden in his pocket, and that they were recently run out of town after a misunderstanding that involved Lennie petting a girl's skirt and then seizing her in a panic when she tried to run away.
Anyhow, with the overall plan of getting my new little clay studio ready for clay, I figured it was high time this window frame was cleaned up and saw the light of day.
I considered sharing some of the pages here, but decided against it in the end. Perhaps I will when the notebook is full (at this rate, that will happen on the 10th of May), but it didn’t seem like a good idea now. I felt that if I knew I was writing for a blog, I would alter what I was writing to be something I wanted my particular blog readers to see, and that is not the idea.
A thick paper or plastic plate to use as your palette
You are just going to love this sweet little shop once we get it all prettied up.
We have her one year photo session with the wonderful Stacy Hart on Saturday. She's going to wear a cute little lace romper (and pearls!) Plus we're doing a cake smash (I really hope she tears into the cake this time!) I can't wait :)
The Grand Canyon
Life if going about at a whirlwind pace, but I think it’s more my noticing than anything changing. Whenever I think, “I should post on my blog,” I find I have nothing to say!
How Do I Love Thee?
• Ourayle House brought Summit Pale Ale, brewed with Summit hops. Another good one from Mr. Grumpy Pants, who does well with pale ales.
Good Wedding Photographers are worth their weight in gold - five, ten, twenty years on and the photos are the gateway to the memories of one of the most special days of a couple’s life. And yet, while the happy couple may be prepared to spend thousands, or even tens of thousands on their wedding, too often they will skimp on the photographer – looking for the cheapest option - only to regret it for many years to come.
My submission for the weekly photo challenge: unfocused is a fire-breathing dragon or dragon fire.
Missed the ball on that one.
Imago: Insect in its sexually mature adult stage after metamorphosis.
· 1/4 cup raisins
The info below is based on my personal observations, my daily reading of vast amounts of information and information I gather.
Eustace Mullins: Hitler, Nazi Party, International Zionism And The Holocaust! Jim Condit, Jr.’s Film (Excerpts) “The Final Solution to Adolf Hitler: Zionist Collaboration with the Nazis”! Brother Nathanael: Why Did Goldstone Betray The Truth? Ron Paul: ‘Ultimately The Big One Is To Control The Money… To Have A World Wide Fiat Currency Through The IMF/World Bank Operations!’ Ron Paul: Gold, Commodity Prices “Big Event” Signaling Economic Collapse! Bob Chapman: The Financial System Designed To Self Destruct! Once The Dollar is Dethroned Americans Will Have To Live on The Edges of The Economic And Financial World ! World Banks Run on Cocaine Cash! ‘They Are All Terrorists!’
During the in interview the pop singer beauty admitted that she has a soft spot for Prince Harry and she thinks he simply amazing as she said:
We’ve Done it A Lot…
The Solar Eclipse of Sunday, May 20th, represents a powerful time, taking place in the first degree of Gemini and thus sextile to the Aries point. Mercury rules the sign of Gemini and is found in Taurus, in conjunction with Jupiter and in aspect to Saturn and to newly retrograde Venus. Both thought and emotion are brought to the fore and in combination, granting you an unusual opportunity to come to a better set of ideas concerning your earthly situation. Since Venus is exactly trine Saturn, your love-life and relationship energy is inward and somewhat stifled, but intensified. In addition to the important relationships in your life, you are seeking to concretize as well your dreams and your artistic impulses.
I'm experiencing this now during my stay in Mexico. I have always liked Mexican culture -- in particular, the ancient culture and the weird way in which it has melded with Christianity. It's all very well to admire and study it from afar, but now I have to live in this different culture. I personally am having a blast -- I love the culture as much or more as I ever did,** or more -- but I know it's been more of a struggle for other members of our group.
Cash Advance Loans- Use Now Pay out After
First a big thanks to Pro Compression for generously offering the compression socks for this giveaway! They have always had great customer service and responded quickly when I emailed them with questions. I'm talking before all this giveaway business when I was just a regular customer ordering socks. Customer service goes a long way with me, and Pro Compression has got the goods and the service. Lethal (meaning awesome) combo.
A good idea is to make automatic withdrawals to a savings account that earns high interest. This may be strange, but it’ll become routine after a couple months. You’ll see it like a bill, and you can watch the savings grow in no time.
Often overlooked before it's too late, your lips are defenseless when it comes to the elements. Lips contain very little melanin—the natural skin pigment that helps screen out the sun's harmful rays. With SPF 15, Sun Shades lip balms pamper and protect your lips with natural moisturizers like jojoba oil, cocoa butter, and beeswax. Antioxidant vitamin E fights free radicals. These lip-smacking balms "weatherproof " your lips and help keep them soft. You use sunscreen on your arms, legs, and the rest of your body. Remember your lips with Sun Shades lip balms. Available in Sugar & Spice, Mountain Mint, Vanilla Bean, and Piña Colada flavors, Sun Shades lip balm moisturize and protect your lips for hours.
Looking For Eric
I'll explain my conclusion in a later post, but for the past few days, my tiny brain developed an idea. What if I could write a comedy about my life? What if I could share all my bad experiences in a way that will make others laugh? Of course, bad experiences aren't a laughing matter, but it's better than being depressed, right?
Do you ever get the notion that once you achieve some particular goal, you’ll finally be cool?
Thank you for stopping by to spend time in my garden. If you enjoyed this article, please let me know. I will be delighted if you would suggest Gardens Inspired to your friends, follow me or subscribe to my Blog.
I traced leather blanes
Just for today, do not worry
This gas field is found in the North Sea.
Over the following years, Castro’s revolutionary government expropriated $25 billion of private property with little or no compensation, nationalized public utilities, tightened controls on the private sector, shut down the notorious gambling industry, and instituted a national program of healthcare & education — reforms which led to hundreds of thousands of Cubans fleeing the country, while dramatically improving the lives of the poor. In 1960 and 61, the CIA tried to assassinate Castro (in collusion with the Chicago mafia that controlled the gambling in Cuba), which probably led to the Bay of Pigs invasion, an attempt by U.S.-trained Cuban nationals to unseat Castro which ended in abject defeat after a mere three days.
Are all Trans Fats bad? No. And this is where things can get a little bit complicated, and why mandatory labeling of foods with trans fats could cause some real problems. Remember when I said that MOST naturally occurring carbon-carbon double bonds in unsaturated fatty acids are cis? Well, most is not all. Small amounts of trans fatty acids are found in the milk and meat (in the fat) from ruminants (cow, goat, sheep, deer).
Other Books by E. Lockhart
Recipe: CUBA LIBRE A LA FRUGAL CITY GIRL, AGE 18 AND TWO MONTHS
3. Know when to change your plan
like striking a fire between flint and Burdock.
People look a million times better when they want to have their pictures taken. You will all develop your own style of how to do this. Aimee will have conversations with her subjects to get them relaxed. Explain what you're going to do. She'll get down on a kids' level. She’ll explain: This is what we're going to do, this is what to expect from me, this is what you need to do. The other big thing she does is that she's a total goofball and she's willing to do is have them do their silly faces or mad faces and get whole series of them laughing or otherwise capturing natural emotions more than telling them to simply smile. Find out what they like to do and get pictures that capture what they're doing rather than just capturing a smile in a pose.
'The Government must take strong measures on the affordability and availability of alcohol to reduce the unnecessary burden on the NHS and improve everyone's health.'
Nope. Probably not. Just suffering severe pain every time they eat. My doctor has officially put me on a gluten free diet until I can get in to see the GI Dr next month. The Dr wants to see if this could be the problem. Hmmm to hope it's something else so I can eat all the yummy junk and not break an arm and leg to pay for gluten free food? Sounds good to me, except it could be a worse problem, so which of two bad evils do I want? I guess all I can do is wait and see.
Yesterday I found out that someone I know, and with whom I’ve been in reasonably close contact with the past couple of years, passed over very suddenly. It’s been a shock to my system to say the least, and I was feeling quite numb yesterday. However, I am not really too sad, not for him anyway. It was time for his spirit/soul to move on with the next stage of life and his physical earthly body is no longer needed. It’s ok, it is as it should be. However, I am sad and concerned for those left behind; his family, friends and co-workers because this is going to hit them really hard and there is much sorrow among them.
"The project is effectively stopped," said Dan Andrews, a spokesman for Borough President Helen Marshall said last Thursday, "We met with DCAS and asked them to do a study of the remaining trees in the back."
Late this afternoon, the day after her birthday, the doctors office called to tell me I have a lesion on the upper right side of my breast and they are scheduling an ultrasound.
Here’s the Etch-A-Sketch doodle I made in honor of Jen’s impending departure to Germany:
First up to bat was the SPECIAL ALE, which they call and ESB but seems to be a bit more than that. The color is a light cranberry red. It's clear except for that hazy fog on the glass. A half-finger of foamy off-white head sits atop the bubbly brew. Nice to look at.
We made it home safe (walking) and I was up and ready for work at 0430 again this morning. Feeling a little lousy but I pounded a bottle of water and a Gatorade on my drive in and as you can see, now I’m just sitting at work writing about it so I guess my day isn’t going to badly. I guess I wasn’t THAT irresponsible last night after all.
Instead of comparing yourself with rich people, compare yourself with genuinely poor people. You will soon realize the abundance that is all around -- how blessed we are to have loved ones to sacrifice for -- and how energizing the challenge can be.
I have been getting some requests inquiring about our "fun" zone, a.k.a. our playroom. And consider me massive yippee skippy excited about sharing this space in our home. I think IHeart it as much as the kids do, maybe even more!
The laser was found in a drawer in the master bedroom of the home.
The truly creative person knows that all creating is acheived through working with constraints. Without constraints there is no creating.
Anyway, I wish I had more to say right now. But I don't, so I'll just peter out in much the same way way as my wedding speech by saying "Umm...thanks" with a crack in my voice, and sitting down.
P.S. I don’t care what any whinny kid from Facebook has to say, Toby McGuire is real Spider-Man.
Divide the buttercream (you'll have about 6 cups total) into two bowls. Add the melted chocolate to one bowl and stir with a spatula to combine, and add the 1/2 cup expresso to the other bowl, similarly using a spatula to combine. Set both bowls aside.
the beak is made of little summer sun (also retired) triangles. I raised the whole thing on dimensionals.
Going by last year’s record, it would be a “yes”. But expect police to be more restrained. Ambiga has simply this advice: “Be prepared.”
Most professional chefs know that it is the freshness and quality of ingredients that make or break a dish. That is why you often see them using fresh herbs instead of dried. As a home chef, you can do the same.
Thursday saw her pen Boldt names American (political) idols on the All Politics is Local blog, praising Boldt for admiring Democrat Brian Baird, former 3rd Congressional District Representative and for his view of, “If someone didn’t cross over, nothing would get accomplished,” style of governance.
And that's all I've got today.
It's nice to be reminded, now and again, that even though we live in fallen times, still the occasional goddess walks among us. Of that small number, it's even nicer to discover that one of them is, all indications to the contrary, sane, funny, wise, and really kind of a hell of a writer.
-bone-in skin-on chicken thighs, trimmed of bigger fat pockets (sorry that's such a gross thing to say, but it's so worth it)
If anyone hears my voice
Definitely, it is old, but the great wooden hall has been rebuilt twice (the present hall was rebuilt in 1709, smaller than the original). The statue too has been reconstructed at different periods due to various reasons such as fire and earthquake. The hands are from the 16th – 17th century and the head is from the Edo period. Since the Edo period spans from 1615-1867, I’m kind of curious as to when exactly the head was made!
So, how do we actually do all of that? There is a Orchestrator Webservices integration pack, available at http://scorch.codeplex.com/releases/view/87038 that can help us with this use case. Step one is to create a connection to the webservice of the environment you want to monitor
5/15 Akron, OH - Musica
take care -
I've been feeling really good... I have so much energy, I've been sleeping great lately and I just feel better.
Preheat oven to 375 and butter a 9 inch cake pan.
I have to tell you...12 seconds later I was giggling.
Level 4: MP Cost: 6, Damage: 260%, Attacks up to 5 enemies.
The next major thing we need to do is to collect seeds. We planned to save seeds from all of our favorite tomatoes, but with the business of the garden and life in general, many varieties passed us by. Luckily there are a few that we can save seed from, but others will have to be started from leftover seed from this spring or new seed.
Chris Wilson - guitar & vocals
Protagonist Claire Danes (who plays Carrie) is from the Jack Nicholson, Daniel Day Lewis school of overacting. You always feel she is self-consciously playing the role, with every eye lash movement calculated. Like her trademark crying, all this doesn’t seem natural but neither is her character; a cliched workaholic prone to sleeping on her own couch, complete with – wait for it! – expired food in her fridge! Well, Carrie’s makeup and hair always get careful attention, so why not other parts of her life?
Joe Esposito - My Girl
I've decided to join in the blog event at the end seeing as this is the most exciting post of them all. Anyways here are the Top 10 Books I'm Looking Forward to in 2012!
Bake for 40-45 minutes. It should start to bubble but not brown. Allow the cake to cool in the tin because it will be too soft to remove. As it cools slightly you can ease it around the edges and turn out. Dust with icing sugar. It will harden as it cools.
I will make a radical statement here-
Twists of fate and quirks of timing play out in this thoughtful novel about family connections, second chances and first loves. Set over a 24-hour-period, Hadley and Oliver's story will make you believe that true love finds you when you're least
* Dr Alexander Vida's article, "Imitation of Distinctive Signs: Trademark Law and/or Competition Law?"
Hope you enjoy this as much as I do..
Our comment:
Light figures into a good number of poems in other ways, even unexpected ones. In the fun poem “Five Places for Sex,” which is written with a disproportionate number of end-stopped lines, making the poem look like a crude movie script, emphasizing the action—alas, even this formal strategy does not limit Klein’s gentle, perhaps understandably sentimental, philosophizing:
